Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
(Payment for Substance Use Disorder Treatment)
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 743A.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Group health insurance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.098.
(b) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(c) “Substance use disorder” has the meaning given that term  in the fifth edition of the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual  of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric
Association.
(d) “Utilization review” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS  743A.168, an issuer of group health insurance
or an individual health benefit plan,  other than a health plan that is subject to 42 U.S.C.
18011:
(a) May not impose a requirement for  prior authorization or any other form of utilization
review for the reimbursement of a covered medication approved  by the United States Food
and Drug Administration that is prescribed for  the purpose of treating a substance use dis-
order, including but not limited to opioid addiction and opioid withdrawal.
(b) Shall reimburse the cost of  refills of medications described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection if dispensed by a  licensed health care professional who is legally authorized to
dispense such medications, including early refills described in section 7 of this section.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section applies to any form of buprenorphine, including but  not
limited to sublingual, tablet or injectable forms.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 1
(4) This section does not prohibit prior authorization or  other utilization review for
opioids or opiates prescribed for a purpose other than medication-assisted treatment or the
treatment of opiate abuse or addiction.
(5) This section does not prohibit utilization review for the purpose of:
(a) Auditing claims for improper payments, fraud or abuse; or
(b) Reasonable periodic redeterminations about the need for continuing care.
(6) Coverage under this section may be subject to the  same terms and conditions that
apply to other benefits under the plan except  for utilization review as provided in subsection
(2) of this section.
(7) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 743A.168 is amended to read:
743A.168. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation by  a provider, in person or using tele-
medicine, to determine a patient’s need for behavioral health treatment.
(b) “Behavioral health condition” has the meaning prescribed by  rule by the Department of
Consumer and Business Services.
(c) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in  an insured’s mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient  treatment in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent  a serious deterioration in the insured’s mental or
physical health.
(d) “Facility” means a corporate or governmental entity  or other provider of services for the
treatment of behavioral health conditions.
(e) “Generally accepted standards of care” means:
(A) Standards of care and clinical practice guidelines that:
(i) Are generally recognized by health care providers practicing in  relevant clinical specialties;
and
(ii) Are based on valid, evidence-based sources; and
(B) Products and services that:
(i) Address the specific needs of a patient for the purpose of screening for, preventing, diagnos-
ing, managing or treating an illness, injury  or condition or symptoms of an illness, injury or condi-
tion;
(ii) Are clinically appropriate in terms of type, frequency, extent, site and duration; and
(iii) Are  not primarily for the economic benefit of an insurer or payer or for the convenience
of a patient, treating physician or other health care provider.
(f) “Group health insurer” means an insurer, a  health maintenance organization or a health care
service contractor.
(g) “Median maximum allowable reimbursement rate” means the median of all maximum  allow-
able reimbursement rates, minus incentive  payments, paid for each billing code for each provider
type during a calendar year.
(h) “Prior authorization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(i) “Program” means  a particular type or level of service that is organizationally distinct within
a facility.
(j) “Provider” means:
(A) A behavioral health professional or medical professional licensed or certified in this state
who has met the credentialing requirement of a group health insurer or an issuer of an  individual
health benefit plan  that is not a grandfathered health plan as defined in ORS 743B.005 and is oth-
erwise eligible to receive reimbursement for coverage under the policy;
(B) A health care facility as defined in ORS 433.060;
(C) A residential facility as defined in ORS 430.010;
(D) A day or partial hospitalization program;
(E) An outpatient service as defined in ORS 430.010; or
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 2
(F) A  provider organization certified by the Oregon Health Authority under subsection (9) of
this section.
(k) “Relevant clinical specialties” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Psychiatry;
(B) Psychology;
(C) Clinical sociology;
(D) Addiction medicine and counseling; and
(E) Behavioral health treatment.
(L) “Standards of care and clinical practice guidelines” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Patient placement criteria;
(B) Recommendations of agencies of the federal government; and
(C) Drug labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(m) “Utilization review” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(n) “Valid, evidence-based sources” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Peer-reviewed scientific studies and medical literature;
(B) Recommendations of nonprofit health care provider professional associations; and
(C) Specialty societies.
(2) A group health insurance policy or  an individual health benefit plan that is not a grandfa-
thered health plan providing coverage  for hospital or medical expenses, other than limited benefit
coverage, shall provide coverage for expenses arising from  the diagnosis of behavioral health con-
ditions and medically necessary behavioral health treatment at the same level as, and subject to
limitations no more  restrictive than, those imposed on coverage or reimbursement of expenses aris-
ing from treatment for other medical conditions. The following apply to coverage for behavioral
health treatment:
(a) The coverage may be made subject to provisions of the  policy that apply to other benefits
under the policy, including but not limited  to provisions relating to copayments, deductibles and
coinsurance. Copayments, deductibles and coinsurance for treatment  in health care facilities or
residential facilities may not be greater than those under  the policy for expenses of hospitalization
in the treatment of other medical conditions. Copayments, deductibles and coinsurance for outpa-
tient treatment may not be greater than those under the policy for expenses of outpatient  treatment
of other medical conditions.
(b) The coverage of behavioral health treatment  may not be made subject to treatment limita-
tions, limits  on total payments for treatment, limits on duration of treatment or financial require-
ments unless similar limitations  or requirements are imposed on coverage of other medical
conditions. The coverage of eligible expenses of behavioral health  treatment may be limited to
treatment that is medically necessary as determined in accordance with this section and no more
stringently under the policy than for other medical conditions.
(c) The coverage of behavioral health treatment must include:
(A) A behavioral health assessment;
(B) No  less than the level of services determined to be medically necessary in a behavioral
health assessment of the specific needs of a patient or in a patient’s care plan:
(i) To effectively treat the patient’s underlying behavioral health condition rather  than the mere
amelioration of current symptoms such as suicidal ideation or psychosis; and
(ii) For care following a behavioral health crisis, to transition the patient to a  lower level of
care;
(C) Treatment of co-occurring behavioral health conditions or medical conditions in  a coordi-
nated manner;
(D) Treatment at the least intensive and least restrictive level of care that is safe  and most ef-
fective and meets the needs of the insured’s condition;
(E) A lower level or  less intensive care only if it is comparably as safe and effective as treat-
ment at a higher level of service or intensity;
(F) Treatment to maintain functioning or prevent deterioration;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 3
(G) Treatment for an appropriate duration based on the insured’s particular needs;
(H) Treatment appropriate to the unique needs of children and adolescents;
(I) Treatment appropriate to the unique needs of older adults; and
(J) Coordinated care and  case management as defined by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services by rule.
(d) The coverage of behavioral health treatment may not limit coverage for treatment of perva-
sive or chronic behavioral health conditions to short-term or acute behavioral  health treatment at
any level of care or placement.
(e) A group health insurer or an issuer of an individual health benefit plan other than a grand-
fathered health plan shall have a network of providers of behavioral health treatment  sufficient to
meet the standards described  in ORS 743B.505. If there is no in-network provider qualified to timely
deliver, as defined by rule, medically necessary behavioral treatment to an  insured in a geographic
area, the group health insurer or issuer  of an individual health benefit plan shall provide coverage
of out-of-network  medically necessary behavioral health treatment without any additional out-of-
pocket costs if provided by an available out-of-network provider that enters  into an agreement with
the insurer to be reimbursed at in-network rates.
(f) A provider is eligible for reimbursement under this section if:
(A) The provider is approved or certified by the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) The provider is accredited for the particular level of care  for which reimbursement is being
requested by the Joint Commission or the Commission on Accreditation of  Rehabilitation Facilities;
(C) The patient is staying overnight at the  facility and is involved in a structured program at
least eight hours per day, five days per week; or
(D) The provider is providing a covered benefit under the policy.
(g) A group health insurer or an issuer of an  individual health benefit plan other than a
grandfathered health plan must use the  same methodology to set reimbursement rates paid to be-
havioral health treatment providers  that the group health insurer or issuer of an individual health
benefit plan uses to set reimbursement rates for medical and surgical treatment providers.
(h) A group health insurer or an  issuer of an individual health benefit plan other than a
grandfathered  health  plan must update the methodology and rates for reimbursing behavioral health
treatment providers in a manner equivalent to the manner in which  the group health insurer or
issuer of an individual health benefit plan updates the  methodology and rates for reimbursing med-
ical and surgical treatment providers, unless otherwise required by federal law.
(i) A group health insurer or an issuer of an individual health  benefit plan other than a grand-
fathered health plan that  reimburses out-of-network providers for medical or surgical services must
reimburse out-of-network behavioral health treatment providers on the same terms and at a rate that
is in parity with the rate paid to medical or surgical treatment providers.
(j) Outpatient coverage of behavioral health treatment  shall include follow-up in-home service
or outpatient services if clinically indicated under criteria and guidelines  described in subsection (5)
of this section. The policy may limit coverage for in-home service to persons who are homebound
under the care of a physician only if clinically  indicated under criteria and guidelines described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(k)(A) Subject to  section 2 of this 2024 Act  and to  the patient or client confidentiality pro-
visions of ORS 40.235 relating to physicians, ORS 40.240  relating to nurse practitioners, ORS 40.230
relating to  psychologists, ORS 40.250 and 675.580 relating to licensed clinical social workers and
ORS 40.262 relating to  licensed professional counselors and licensed marriage and family therapists,
a group health insurer or issuer of an  individual health benefit plan may provide for review for level
of treatment of admissions and continued stays for  treatment in health facilities, residential facili-
ties, day or partial hospitalization programs and outpatient services  by either staff of a group health
insurer or issuer of an  individual health benefit plan or personnel under contract to the group
health insurer or issuer of an individual  health benefit plan that is not a grandfathered health plan,
or by a utilization review contractor, who shall have the authority to certify for or deny level  of
payment.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 4
(B) Review shall be made according to criteria made available to  providers in advance upon
request.
(C) Review shall be performed by or under the direction of a physician licensed under ORS
677.100 to 677.228, a psychologist licensed by the Oregon Board of  Psychology, a clinical social
worker licensed by the State Board of  Licensed Social Workers or a professional counselor or
marriage and family therapist licensed by the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and
Therapists, in accordance with  standards of the National Committee for Quality Assurance or
Medicare review standards of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(D) Review may involve prior  [ approval] authorization, concurrent review of the continuation
of treatment, post-treatment review or any combination of  these. However, if prior [ approval] au-
thorization is required, provision shall be made to allow for payment  of urgent or emergency ad-
missions, subject to subsequent review. If prior [ approval] authorization  is not  required, group
health insurers and issuers of  individual health benefit plans that are not grandfathered health plans
shall permit providers, policyholders or persons acting on their behalf to  make advance inquiries
regarding the appropriateness of a particular admission  to a treatment program. Group health
insurers and issuers of individual health benefit plans that are not grandfathered health  plans shall
provide a timely response to such inquiries. Noncontracting providers must cooperate with  these
procedures to the same extent as contracting providers to be eligible for reimbursement.
(L) Health maintenance organizations may  limit the receipt of covered services by enrollees to
services provided by or upon referral by providers contracting with the  health maintenance organ-
ization. Health  maintenance organizations and health care service contractors may create substan-
tive plan benefit and reimbursement differentials at the same level as, and subject to  limitations no
more restrictive than, those imposed on  coverage or reimbursement of expenses arising out of other
medical conditions and apply them to contracting and noncontracting providers.
(3) Except as provided in section 2 of this 2024  Act,  this section does not prohibit a group
health insurer or issuer of an individual health benefit plan that is not a grandfathered  health plan
from managing the provision of benefits through common methods, including but  not limited to se-
lectively contracted panels, health plan benefit differential  designs, preadmission screening, prior
authorization of services, utilization review or other mechanisms designed  to limit eligible expenses
to those  described in subsection (2)(b) of this section provided such methods comply with the re-
quirements of this section.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that health  care cost containment is necessary and intends
to encourage health insurance plans designed to achieve cost containment by ensuring that  re-
imbursement is limited to appropriate utilization under  criteria incorporated into the insurance, ei-
ther directly or by reference, in accordance with this section.
(5)(a) Any medical necessity, utilization or  other clinical review conducted for the diagnosis,
prevention or treatment of behavioral health conditions  or relating to service intensity, level of care
placement, continued stay or discharge must be based solely on the following:
(A) The current generally accepted standards of care.
(B) For level of care placement decisions, the most recent version of the levels of  care place-
ment criteria developed by the nonprofit professional association for the relevant clinical specialty.
(C) For medical necessity, utilization or other clinical review conducted for the diagnosis,  pre-
vention or  treatment of behavioral health conditions that does not involve level of care placement
decisions, other criteria and guidelines may be utilized if such criteria  and guidelines are based on
the current generally accepted standards  of care including valid, evidence-based sources and current
treatment criteria or practice guidelines developed by the nonprofit professional association  for the
relevant clinical specialty. Such other  criteria and guidelines must be made publicly available and
made available to insureds upon request to the extent permitted by copyright laws.
(b) This subsection does not prevent a group health insurer or  an issuer of an individual health
benefit plan other than a grandfathered health plan from using criteria that:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 5
(A) Are outside the scope of criteria and guidelines described in paragraph (a)(B) of  this sub-
section, if the guidelines  were developed in accordance with the current generally accepted stand-
ards of care; or
(B) Are  based on advancements in technology of types of care that are not addressed in the most
recent versions of sources  specified in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, if the guidelines were
developed in accordance with current generally accepted standards of care.
(c) For all level of care placement decisions, an insurer shall authorize  placement at the level
of care consistent with the insured’s score  or assessment using the relevant level of care placement
criteria and guidelines as specified in  paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection. If the level of care indi-
cated by the  criteria and guidelines is not available, the insurer shall authorize the next higher level
of care. If there is disagreement about the appropriate level of care, the insurer shall provide to  the
provider of the service the full details of  the insurer’s scoring or assessment using the relevant level
of care placement criteria and guidelines specified in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(6) To ensure the proper use of any criteria and guidelines described in subsection (5) of this
section, a group health insurer or an issuer of an individual  health benefit plan shall provide, at no
cost:
(a) A formal education program, presented by nonprofit clinical specialty associations or other
entities authorized by  the department, to educate the insurer’s or the issuer’s staff and any indi-
viduals described in subsection (2)(k) of this section who conduct reviews.
(b) To stakeholders, including participating providers and insureds, the  criteria and guidelines
described in subsection (5)  of this section and any education or training materials or resources re-
garding the criteria and guidelines.
(7) This section does not prevent a group health insurer or issuer of  an individual health benefit
plan that is not  a grandfathered health plan from contracting with providers of health care services
to furnish services to policyholders or certificate holders according to ORS 743B.460  or 750.005,
subject to the following conditions:
(a) A group health insurer or issuer of an individual health benefit plan that is not  a grandfa-
thered health plan is not  required to contract with all providers that are eligible for reimbursement
under this section.
(b) An insurer or health care service contractor shall, subject to subsection  (2) of this section,
pay benefits toward the covered charges of  noncontracting providers of services for behavioral
health treatment.  The insured shall, subject to subsection (2) of this section, have the right to use
the services of a noncontracting provider of behavioral health treatment, whether or not  the be-
havioral health treatment is provided by contracting or noncontracting providers.
(8)(a) This section does not require coverage for:
(A) Educational or correctional services or sheltered living provided by a  school or halfway
house;
(B) A long-term residential mental  health program that lasts longer than 45 days unless clin-
ically indicated under criteria and guidelines described in subsection (5) of this section;
(C) Psychoanalysis or psychotherapy received as part  of an educational or training program,
regardless of diagnosis or symptoms that may be present;
(D) A court-ordered sex offender treatment program; or
(E) Support groups.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(A) of this  subsection, an insured may receive covered outpa-
tient services under the terms  of the insured’s policy while the insured is living temporarily in a
sheltered living situation.
(9) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a process for  the certification of an organiza-
tion described in subsection (1)(j)(F) of this section that:
(a) Is not otherwise subject to licensing or certification by the authority; and
(b) Does not contract with  the authority, a subcontractor of the authority or a community
mental health program.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 6
(10) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule standards for the certification provided
under subsection (9) of this section to ensure that a certified provider organization  offers a distinct
and specialized program for the treatment of mental or nervous conditions.
(11) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt by rule an application fee  or a certification fee,
or both, to  be imposed on any provider organization that applies for certification under subsection
(9) of this section. Any fees collected shall be paid into the Oregon Health  Authority Fund estab-
lished in ORS 413.101 and shall be used only for carrying out the provisions of subsection (9) of this
section.
(12) The intent of the Legislative Assembly in adopting  this section is to reserve benefits for
different types of care to encourage cost  effective care and to ensure continuing access to levels
of care most appropriate for  the insured’s condition and progress in accordance with this section.
This section does not  prohibit an insurer from requiring a provider organization certified by the
Oregon Health Authority under subsection  (9) of this section to meet the insurer’s credentialing
requirements as a condition of entering into a contract.
(13) The Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services and the Oregon Health
Authority, after notice and hearing, may adopt reasonable rules not  inconsistent with this section
that are considered necessary  for the proper administration of this section. The director shall adopt
rules making it a  violation of this section for a group health insurer or issuer of an individual health
benefit plan  other than a grandfathered health plan to require providers to bill using a specific
billing code or  to restrict the reimbursement paid for particular billing codes other than on the basis
of medical necessity.
(14) This section does not:
(a) Prohibit an  insured from receiving behavioral health treatment from an out-of-network pro-
vider or prevent an out-of-network  behavioral health provider from billing the insured for any un-
reimbursed cost of treatment.
(b) Prohibit the use of value-based  payment methods, including global budgets or capitated,
bundled, risk-based or other value-based payment methods.
(c) Require that any value-based payment method reimburse behavioral  health services based
on an equivalent fee-for-service rate.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 414.766 is amended to read:
414.766. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 414.065 and 414.690, a coordinated care organization  must
provide behavioral health services to its members that include but  are not limited to all of the fol-
lowing:
(a) For a member who is experiencing a behavioral health crisis:
(A) A behavioral health assessment; and
(B) Services that are medically necessary to transition the member to a lower level of care;
(b) At least the minimum level of services that are  medically necessary to treat a member’s
underlying behavioral health condition rather than a mere amelioration of current symptoms, such
as suicidal ideation or psychosis, as determined  in a behavioral health assessment of the member
or specified in the member’s care plan;
(c) Treatment of co-occurring behavioral health disorders or medical  conditions in a coordinated
manner;
(d) Treatment at the least intensive and least restrictive level of care that is safe  and effective
and meets the needs of the individual’s condition;
(e) For all level of care placement decisions, placement at the level of care consistent with a
member’s score or assessment using the relevant level of care placement criteria and guidelines;
(f) If the level of placement described in paragraph (e) of this subsection is not  available,
placement at the next higher level of care;
(g) Treatment to maintain functioning or prevent deterioration;
(h) Treatment for an appropriate duration based on the individual’s particular needs;
(i) Treatment appropriate to the unique needs of children and adolescents;
(j) Treatment appropriate to the unique needs of older adults;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 7
(k) Treatment that is culturally and linguistically appropriate;
(L) Treatment  that is appropriate to the unique needs of gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgender
individuals and individuals of any other minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(m) Coordinated care and case management  as defined by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services by rule; [ and]
(n) Mental health  wellness appointments as prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority by
rule; and
(o) Medications and refills of medications prescribed for the treatment  of opioid use dis-
order and any co-occurring substance use disorder or  mental health condition, including
early refills as described in section 7 of this 2024 Act .
(2) If there is a disagreement about the level  of care required by subsection (1)(e) or (f) of this
section, a coordinated care organization shall provide to the  behavioral health treatment provider
full details of the coordinated care organization’s scoring or assessment, to the extent permitted  by
the federal  Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act privacy regulations, 45 C.F.R. parts
160 and 164, ORS 192.553 to 192.581 or other state or federal laws limiting  the disclosure of health
information.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  by rule a list of behavioral health services that
may not be subject to prior authorization.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 431A.463 is amended to read:
431A.463. (1) As used in this section, “medication-assisted treatment” means any
medication, and the dispensing or administering of the medication, that is approved  by the
United States Food and  Drug Administration on or before January 1, 2024, for the treatment
of substance use disorders,  and that is used for that purpose, including opioid and opiate
addiction.
[(1)] (2)  The Oregon Health Authority shall prohibit coordinated care organizations and public
payers of health insurance[ , when reimbursing  the cost of medication-assisted treatment for treating
substance use disorders, including opioid and opiate addiction, ] from requiring  prior authorization
[of payment during the first 30 days of medication-assisted  treatment] for the reimbursement of the
costs of medication-assisted treatment .
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a  coordinated care organization may
require prior authorization of a brand name drug for medication-assisted  treatment if a ge-
neric equivalent is available to substitute for a prescribed brand name drug. As used  in this
subsection, a different formulation of the medication is not a generic equivalent.
[(2)] (4) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
(Pharmacist Prescribing and Dispensing of
Opioid Use Disorder Medication Refills)
SECTION 6. Sections 7 and 8 of this 2024 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 689.
SECTION 7. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Early refill” means:
(A) Up to three refills of  a current prescription for a medication that a patient has lost
or that has been stolen or destroyed; or
(B) One refill in a 12 month period of a medication for which the  previous prescription
expired in the prior 12 month period.
(b) “Refill” means a supply of a medication  consistent with the amount specified in the
most recent prescription for the medication.
(2) A pharmacist may prescribe and dispense to a patient, to  the extent permitted by
federal law, an early refill of a medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder  in ac-
cordance with subsection (3) of the section.
(3) A pharmacist who prescribes and dispenses early refills under this section shall:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 8
(a) Complete a patient assessment to determine whether the prescription is appropriate;
(b) Document the patient visit and include notations regarding evidence of the  patient’s
previous prescription from the patient’s licensed health care provider, information relating
to the patient’s treatment and other relevant information; and
(c) Notify the patient’s primary care provider, and the licensed  health care provider who
made the previous prescription,  of the pharmacist’s dispensing of early refills, to the extent
permitted by state and federal law.
(4) Notations in a record documenting evidence of a patient’s  previous prescription under
subsection (3)(b) of this section constitute verification of a valid prescription.
(5) The State Board  of Pharmacy shall adopt rules to carry out this section, including
but not limited to rules to allow a:
(a) Pharmacist to  apply for and obtain a registration number from the Drug Enforcement
Administration of the United States Department of Justice as a mid-level practitioner; and
(b) Pharmacy to store on  the premises medications for the treatment of opioid use dis-
order.
(6) In adopting rules to  carry out this section, the board shall consult with the Public
Health and Pharmacy Advisory Formulary Committee described in ORS 689.649.
SECTION 8.
 (1) As used in  this section, “prescription drug locker” means a mechanical
device that serves as an extension of a retail drug outlet’s will call or point  of sale area in
which completed patient-specific prescription drugs, devices and  related supplies and
nonprescription drugs, devices and related supplies are stored for pickup.
(2) A prescription drug locker located within this state and at  the same physical address
as the retail drug outlet with which the prescription drug locker is associated:
(a) Is considered part of the retail drug outlet and is  not required to obtain a license or
registration from the State Board of Pharmacy; and
(b) Is not required to obtain a registration from the Drug  Enforcement Administration
of the United States Department of Justice.
(3) A prescription drug locker located within this state but at a physical address  other
than the physical address of the retail drug outlet with which the  prescription drug locker
is associated is considered a remote dispensing site pharmacy and must obtain  a registration
from the Drug Enforcement Administration in order to dispense controlled substances.
(4) The board may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 689.005 is amended to read:
689.005. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Administer” means the direct application of a drug or device  whether by injection,
inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or the practitioner’s authorized agent; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(2) “Approved continuing pharmacy education program” means those seminars, classes,
meetings, workshops  and other educational programs on the subject of pharmacy approved by the
State Board of Pharmacy.
(3) “Clinical pharmacy agreement” means an agreement  between a pharmacist or pharmacy and
a health  care organization or a physician as defined in ORS 677.010 or a naturopathic physician as
defined in  ORS 685.010 that permits the pharmacist to engage in the practice of clinical pharmacy
for the benefit of the patients of the health care organization, physician or naturopathic physician.
(4) “Continuing pharmacy education” means:
(a) Professional, pharmaceutical post-graduate  education in the general areas of socio-economic
and legal aspects of health care;
(b) The properties and actions of drugs and dosage forms; and
(c) The etiology, characteristics and therapeutics of the disease state.
(5) “Continuing pharmacy education unit”  means the unit of measurement of credits for ap-
proved continuing education courses and programs.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 9
(6) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted  transfer of a drug or
device other than by administration from one person to another, whether or not for a consideration.
(7) “Device” means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro
reagent or other similar or related article, including any component part or accessory, which is re-
quired under federal or state law to be prescribed by a practitioner and  dispensed by a pharmacist.
(8) “Dispense” or “dispensing” means the preparation and delivery of a  prescription drug pur-
suant to a lawful order of a practitioner in a  suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent
administration to or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug.
(9) “Distribute” means the delivery of a drug other than by administering or dispensing.
(10) “Drug” means:
(a) Articles recognized as drugs in the official United  States Pharmacopoeia, official National
Formulary, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia, other drug compendium or any  supplement to any
of them;
(b) Articles intended for use in  the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of dis-
ease in a human or other animal;
(c) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the  structure or any function of the body of
humans or other animals; and
(d) Articles intended for use as a  component of any articles specified in paragraph (a), (b) or (c)
of this subsection.
(11) “Drug order”  means a written order, in a hospital or other inpatient care facility, for an
ultimate user of any drug or device issued and signed by a practitioner, or an order  transmitted by
other means of communication from a practitioner, that  is immediately reduced to writing by a
pharmacist, licensed nurse or other practitioner.
(12) “Drug outlet” means a pharmacy, nursing home, shelter home, convalescent home, extended
care facility, drug abuse  treatment center, penal institution, hospital, family planning clinic, student
health center, retail store, wholesaler, manufacturer, mail-order vendor or other establishment with
facilities located within or  out of this state that is engaged in dispensing, delivery or distribution
of drugs within this state.
(13) “Drug room” means a secure and lockable  location within an inpatient care facility that
does not have a licensed pharmacy.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission”  means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer  terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or similar apparatus having electrical,  digital,
magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Injectable hormonal contraceptive” means a drug composed of  a hormone or a combination
of hormones that is approved  by the United States Food and Drug Administration to prevent preg-
nancy and that a health care practitioner administers to the patient by injection.
(16) “Institutional  drug outlet” means hospitals and inpatient care facilities where medications
are dispensed to another health care professional for administration to patients served by the hos-
pitals or facilities.
(17) “Intern” means a person who is enrolled in or has completed a course of study at  a school
or college of pharmacy approved by the board and who is licensed with the board as an intern.
(18) “Internship” means a professional experiential program approved by  the board under the
supervision of a licensed pharmacist registered with the board as a preceptor.
(19) “Labeling” means  the process of preparing and affixing of a label to any drug container
exclusive,  however,  of the labeling by a manufacturer, packer or distributor of a nonprescription
drug or commercially packaged legend drug or device.
(20) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing of a device or a drug, either directly or indirectly by  extraction from substances of
natural origin or independently  by means of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substances or labeling or
relabeling of its container,  except that this term does not include the preparation or compounding
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 10
of a  drug by an individual for their own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling
of a drug:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to administering or dispensing of a drug in the course of
professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner  or by the practitioner’s authorization under supervision of the practitioner
for the purpose of or as an incident to research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(21) “Manufacturer” means a person engaged in the manufacture of drugs.
(22) “Nonprescription drug outlet” means a business or other  establishment that is open to the
general public for the sale or nonprofit distribution of nonprescription drugs and is  registered under
ORS 689.305.
(23) “Nonprescription drugs” means drugs that may be sold without a prescription and  that are
prepackaged for use by the consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements  of the stat-
utes and regulations of this state and the federal government.
(24) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association or other legal entity.
(25) “Pharmacist” means an individual licensed by  this state to engage in the practice of phar-
macy or to engage in the practice of clinical pharmacy.
(26) “Pharmacy” means  a place that meets the requirements of rules of the board, is licensed
and approved by the board where the practice of  pharmacy may lawfully occur and includes
apothecaries, drug stores, dispensaries, hospital outpatient pharmacies, pharmacy departments  and
prescription laboratories but does not include a place used by a manufacturer or wholesaler.
(27) “Pharmacy technician” means a person licensed by the board who assists in  the practice
of pharmacy pursuant to rules of the board.
(28) “Practice of clinical pharmacy” means:
(a) The health science discipline in which, in conjunction with the  patient’s other practitioners,
a pharmacist provides patient care  to optimize medication therapy and to promote disease pre-
vention and the patient’s health and wellness;
(b) The provision of patient care services, including but not  limited to post-diagnostic disease
state management services; and
(c) The practice of pharmacy by a pharmacist pursuant to a clinical pharmacy agreement.
(29) “Practice of pharmacy” means:
(a) The interpretation and evaluation of prescription orders;
(b) The compounding, dispensing and labeling of drugs and devices, except labeling by a man-
ufacturer, packer or  distributor of nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged legend drugs
and devices;
(c) The prescribing and administering of  vaccines and immunizations and the providing of pa-
tient care services pursuant to ORS 689.645;
(d) The administering of drugs and devices to the extent permitted under ORS 689.655;
(e) The participation in drug selection and drug utilization reviews;
(f) The proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and the maintenance of proper records  re-
garding the safe storage of drugs and devices;
(g) The responsibility for advising, where necessary or  where regulated, of therapeutic values,
content, hazards and use of drugs and devices;
(h) The monitoring of therapeutic response or adverse effect to drug therapy;
(i) The optimizing of drug therapy through the practice of clinical pharmacy;
(j) Patient care services, including medication therapy  management and comprehensive
medication review;
(k) The offering  or performing of those acts, services, operations or transactions necessary in
the conduct, operation, management and control of pharmacy;
(L) The prescribing and administering of injectable hormonal contraceptives and the prescribing
and dispensing of self-administered hormonal contraceptives pursuant to ORS 689.689;
(m) The prescribing and dispensing of emergency refills of  insulin and associated insulin-related
devices and supplies pursuant to ORS 689.696;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 11
(n) The prescribing, dispensing and administering of preexposure prophylactic  antiretroviral
therapies and post-exposure prophylactic antiretroviral therapies,  pursuant to ORS 689.704 and rules
adopted by the board under ORS 689.645 and 689.704; [ and]
(o) The delegation of tasks to other health care providers who are appropriately  trained and
authorized to perform the delegated tasks ; and
(p) The prescribing and dispensing of early refills of medication for the treatment of
opioid use disorder pursuant to section 7 of this 2024 Act .
(30) “Practitioner” means a person licensed and operating within the scope of such license  to
prescribe, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer drugs in  the course of profes-
sional practice or research:
(a) In this state; or
(b) In another state  or territory of the United States if the person does not reside in Oregon
and is registered under the federal Controlled Substances Act.
(31) “Preceptor” means  a pharmacist or a person licensed by the board to supervise the
internship training of a licensed intern.
(32) “Prescription drug” or “legend drug” means a drug that is:
(a) Required by federal  law, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled with either of
the following statements:
(A) “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription”; or
(B) “Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed
veterinarian”; or
(b) Required by any applicable federal or state law or regulation  to be dispensed on prescription
only or is restricted to use by practitioners only.
(33) “Prescription” or “prescription  drug order” means a written, oral or electronically trans-
mitted direction, given by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs,  for the preparation and use
of a drug.  When the context requires, “prescription” also means the drug prepared under such
written, oral or electronically transmitted direction.
(34) “Retail drug outlet” means a place used for the conduct  of the retail sale, administering or
dispensing or compounding of drugs or  chemicals or for the administering or dispensing of pre-
scriptions and licensed by the board as  a place where the practice of pharmacy may lawfully occur.
(35) “Self-administered hormonal contraceptive” means a drug composed of  a hormone or a
combination of hormones that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration  to
prevent pregnancy and that the patient to whom the drug is prescribed may administer to oneself.
“Self-administered  hormonal  contraceptive” includes, but is not limited to, hormonal contraceptive
patches and hormonal contraceptive pills.
(36) “Third-party logistics provider” means an entity that:
(a) Provides or  coordinates warehousing of, or other logistics services for, a product in inter-
state commerce on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale distributor or dispenser of the product; and
(b) Does not  take ownership of, or have responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of, the
product.
(37) “Unit dose” means a sealed single-unit container so designed that the contents  are admin-
istered to the  patient as a single dose, direct from the container. Each unit dose container must bear
a separate label, be labeled with the name and  strength of the medication, the name of the man-
ufacturer or distributor, an identifying lot number and, if applicable, the expiration  date of the
medication.
(38) “Wholesale distributor drug outlet” means a person, other than a manufacturer,
manufacturer’s colicensed partner, third-party logistics  provider or repackager, as defined in 21
U.S.C. 360eee(16), that is engaged in wholesale distribution, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 353(e)(4).
(Access to Addiction Treatment
by Members of Coordinated Care Organizations)
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 12
SECTION 10.  ORS 414.609 is amended to read:
414.609. (1)  A coordinated care organization that contracts with the Oregon Health Authority
must maintain a network of providers , including but not limited  to addiction treatment provid-
ers, sufficient in numbers and areas  of practice and geographically distributed in a manner to en-
sure that the health services provided under the contract are reasonably accessible to members.
(2) A member may transfer from one organization to another organization no  more than once
during each enrollment period.
(Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission Study)
SECTION 11. (1) The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission created under ORS 430.221
shall conduct a study of barriers to and best practices for:
(a) Youth accessing opioid use disorder treatment; and
(b) Increasing access to opioid use disorder medications, including:
(A) Opioid use disorder medication treatment interventions and the prescribing of  opioid
use disorder medication in emergency departments; and
(B) Increasing the number of providers of opioid use disorder treatment statewide.
(2) In studying the barriers to and best practices for youth  accessing opioid use disorder
treatment under subsection (1)(a) of this  section, the commission shall collaborate with
participating state agencies, as defined in ORS 430.221, and the System  of Care Advisory
Council established in ORS 418.978.
(3) No later than September 30, 2024,  the commission shall provide to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to health a report on the status of the study and
any preliminary recommendations that the commission has developed.
(4) No later than September 15, 2025, the commission shall report  to the interim com-
mittees of  the Legislative Assembly related to behavioral health, in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245:
(a) A strategic plan to improve the access of youth to opioid use disorder treatment;
(b) A strategic plan that  includes evidence-based and evidence-informed strategies for
increasing the number of opioid  use disorder treatment providers statewide and expanding
the capacity of the opioid use disorder treatment system in this state;
(c) Recommendations for reducing the barriers to accessing opioid use  disorder treat-
ment, including barriers to the provision  of opioid use disorder treatment interventions in
emergency departments; and
(d) Needed changes to address obstacles encountered by behavioral health providers when
seeking health insurance reimbursement for  opioid use disorder medications, including but
not limited to:
(A) Requiring providers to use specialty pharmacies instead  of purchasing medications
directly from vendors and billing the insurers;
(B) Limiting the coverage of opioid use disorder treatment to specific forms of
medications, such as sublingual or injectable forms;
(C) Imposing limits on  the amount of an opioid use disorder medication that may be
dispensed during a single visit; and
(D) Obstacles identified from data regarding insurance claim denials, including  retroac-
tive denials, of reimbursement for opioid use disorder medications.
SECTION 12.
Section 11 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
(Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Program)
SECTION 13. Section 14 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 413.
SECTION 14. (1) The certified community behavioral  health clinic program is established
in the Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of  certifying community behavioral health
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 13
clinics that meet criteria adopted by  the authority by rule to receive prospective fixed cost-
based rates, as provided in subsection (4) of this section, for  services provided to medical
assistance enrollees.
(2) The authority shall appoint an advisory committee, as described in ORS 183.333,  to
advise the authority in the adoption  of rules to carry out this section. The Director of the
Oregon Health Authority shall appoint to the advisory  committee 15 individuals who repre-
sent a  diverse constituency and are knowledgeable about certified community behavioral
health clinic delivery systems,  patient-centered primary care home delivery systems, inte-
grated health care or health care quality. At least five members of the advisory  committee
must be current or former consumers of the type of  behavioral health services that are
typically provided by certified community behavioral health clinics  or family members, rep-
resentatives or advocates for such consumers. Rules adopted by the authority:
(a) Must be consistent with the criteria adopted by the United States  Department of
Health and Human Services for certified community behavioral health clinics; and
(b) Shall ensure that certified community behavioral health clinics provide, either di-
rectly or by referral through formal relationships with other providers, all  of the services
required by the criteria adopted by the United States  Department of Health and Human
Services for certified community behavioral health clinics.
(3) If the authority adopts  requirements for certified community behavioral health clinics
that are in addition to  the criteria described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the authority
shall:
(a) Provide funding to the clinics sufficient to reimburse the  costs of the additional re-
quirements; or
(b) Have a process for granting allowable variances to one or more of the requirements.
(4)(a) A certified community  behavioral health clinic shall complete the federally required
cost report for the authority to  review and approve the clinic’s prospective fixed cost-based
rate for a patient encounter.
(b) The authority shall regularly adjust the prospective fixed  cost-based rate at intervals
consistent with federal guidance. A certified community behavioral health  clinic may request
a rate adjustment if a clinic changes the clinic’s scope of services.
(c) The authority shall adopt and provide  to certified community behavioral health clinics
guidance on the development of fixed rates and billing. The fixed rate must include  but is
not limited to:
(A) An estimate of the projected cost of anticipated expansions of the  certified commu-
nity behavioral health clinic program or the populations served by the program; and
(B) The cost of  the technology and data systems needed by each clinic to track and
measure outcomes and other data that the authority requires to be tracked or measured.
(d) The authority shall review federal guidance on rate setting for  clinics that are dually
certified as federally qualified health centers, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(l)(2), and as cer-
tified community behavioral health clinics and  provide recommendations to such dually cer-
tified clinics about how the clinics can best bill for services.
(5) In any geographic region of this state that is served by both a certified community
behavioral health clinic and a community mental health program:
(a) Before the  authority may approve the certification of a certified community behav-
ioral health clinic, the certified community behavioral  health clinic and the community
mental health program shall enter  into a written agreement concerning collaboration be-
tween the clinic and the program in  the coordination of services that are provided by both
the clinic and the program.
(b) The authority shall develop a plan to ensure:
(A) Coordination of services between the clinic and  the program to minimize service re-
dundancies; and
(B) Financial efficiencies to maximize financial benefits.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 14
(6) This section  does not require a clinic that is eligible for certification under this sec-
tion to apply for certification. Participation in the certified community behavioral health
clinic program is voluntary.
SECTION 15. (1) Prior to January 15, 2025, the Oregon Health Authority shall begin pre-
paring a draft state plan amendment to submit to the Centers for Medicare  and Medicaid
Services to implement the certified community behavioral health  clinic program established
in section 14 of this 2024 Act.
(2) Prior to the expiration of the community behavioral health clinic  demonstration pro-
gram described in section 223 of the Protecting Access to Medicare  Act of 2014 (P.L. 113-93),
as amended, the  authority shall seek federal approval for an amendment to the Medicaid
state plan to allow the state to receive federal financial participation  in the costs of the
certified community behavioral health clinic program established in section 14  of this 2024
Act.
(3) The authority  shall explore all prospective rate methodologies allowed for the certified
community behavioral health clinic model by the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid Ser-
vices.
(Joint Task Force on Regional Behavioral Health Accountability)
SECTION 16. (1) The Joint Task Force on Regional Behavioral Health Accountability  is
established to make recommendations to  the Legislative Assembly to improve the
governance of behavioral health systems and strengthen evidence-based and equitable fund-
ing decisions and accountability of behavioral health systems.
(2) The task force consists of 26 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from among  members of the
Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of  Representatives, one from the majority party and one from the
minority party.
(c) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint one member from the Judicial
Department.
(d) The Governor shall appoint 21 members as follows:
(A) One member representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) One member representing the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission;
(C) One member representing the Department of Human Services;
(D) One member representing coordinated care organizations;
(E) One member representing providers of psychiatric care in clinical settings;
(F) One member representing Oregon counties;
(G) One member representing Oregon cities;
(H) One member who provides county  mental health services or who represents county
mental health providers;
(I) One member from a large labor organization representing behavioral health workers;
(J) One member who is  a behavioral health provider or who represents private and
nonprofit behavioral health providers;
(K) One member who provides nonprofit substance use disorder  treatment or who re-
presents nonprofit substance use disorder treatment providers;
(L) One member from a large labor organization representing nurses;
(M) One member who is a licensed doctor or who represents licensed  doctors with expe-
rience in behavioral health or  substance use disorder treatment programs, care delivery or
funding;
(N) One member from a business coalition representing the hospital industry;
(O) One member from a business coalition representing the insurance industry;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 15
(P) One member from a business coalition representing pharmacists;
(Q) One member representing a consumer of behavioral health services;
(R) One member with extensive experience in Oregon Indian  tribes and a deep under-
standing of Oregon’s rural and urban tribal populations, appointed  after consultation with
the Commission on Indian Services;
(S) One member who is an emergency response transportation provider;
(T) One member representing long term care facilities; and
(U) One member with experience in regional behavioral health system governance.
(3) The task force, in collaboration  with any other task forces that are charged with
scopes of work that overlap  or intersect with the charges of the Joint Task Force on Re-
gional Behavioral Health Accountability, shall develop recommendations to:
(a) Improve collaboration and  accountability across federal, state and local behavioral
health and substance use disorder treatment programs and funding;
(b) Ensure equitable outcomes in  publicly supported treatment settings across Oregon
communities;
(c) Provide greater cost efficiencies in the  continuum of care of Oregon’s behavioral
health system; and
(d) Establish broad access to methadone and other  opioid use disorder medications
through mobile devices, telehealth and pharmacy-based services to measurably  increase the
engagement statewide of individuals with opioid use disorder in opioid use disorder  treat-
ment.
(4) Recommendations developed under subsection (3) of this section should include:
(a) Any  statutory changes needed to ensure that federal, state and local funds are being
spent to maximize outcomes and resource efficiency;
(b) Policy changes  recommended based on a comparative analysis of policies in other
states that spend less on treatment but demonstrate better  behavioral health and substance
use disorder treatment outcomes, including better  outcomes for groups that are dispropor-
tionately impacted by health inequities; and
(c) Any governance changes that would facilitate greater alignment of spending  decisions
between federal, state and local behavioral health and substance use disorder treatment
programs.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11)(a) The task force shall provide draft  recommendations developed under subsections
(3) and (4) of this section  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
health no later than September 15, 2025.
(b) The task force shall submit a final report of the task  force’s recommendations, in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to health no later than December 15, 2025.
(12) The Legislative Policy and  Research Director shall provide staff support to the task
force, including by:
(a) Researching and providing analysis on current behavioral health funding streams that
support the continuum of care across Oregon communities;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 16
(b) Reviewing strategies that have been successful  in other states, including through the
use of federal Medicaid waivers or Medicaid demonstration projects;
(c) Reviewing data related to the challenges faced by individuals receiving substance use
disorder treatment in publicly supported treatment settings; and
(d) Reviewing the responsibilities of county and state agencies and the accountability of
county and state agencies for providing behavioral health and substance  use disorder treat-
ment.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are  nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 17.
Section 16 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
(Task Force on Improving the Safety
of Behavioral Health Workers)
SECTION 18. (1) The Task Force on Improving the Safety of Behavioral Health Workers
is established.
(2) The task force consists of 17 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from among  members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The President and the Speaker shall jointly appoint:
(A) Four employers of  behavioral health workers including one from county government;
(B) Two behavioral health workers;
(C) Two representatives of organized labor representing behavioral health workers;
(D) One consumer of behavioral health services;
(E) One representative of the state protection and advocacy system described in ORS
192.517 (1); and
(F) One representative  of the Oregon State Hospital or the Oregon Health Authority on
behalf of the hospital.
(d) The Governor shall appoint two members from the  Occupational Safety and Health
Division of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(3) The task force shall  produce a set of recommendations for improving the safety of
behavioral health workers.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 17
(10) No later than September 1, 2024, the  task force shall submit to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to health a  preliminary report containing draft
policy recommendations to address the safety concerns  that are prevalent in the behavioral
health industry including recommendations, by type of behavioral health  facility or
workplace setting, for:
(a) Physical and structural security requirements;
(b) Safe staffing levels;
(c) Standards and procedures for reporting assaults;
(d) Best  practices for worker safety training including minimum requirements for train-
ing on workplace safety protocols;
(e) Minimum standards for safety protocols and procedures;
(f) Strategies to ensure compliance with  all worker safety and training requirements; and
(g) Potential sources of funding to mitigate the  costs incurred by implementing any of
the recommendations.
(11) No later than December 1, 2024, the task force  shall report the task force’s final
recommendations, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of  the
Legislative Assembly related to health.
(12) The Legislative Policy and  Research Director shall provide staff support to the task
force and the Legislative Counsel shall provide legal support for the task force recommen-
dations including but not limited to drafting proposed legislative changes.
(13) Members  of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative Assembly  or ap-
pointed by the Governor shall be paid compensation and reimbursed  for actual and necessary
travel and other expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official  duties on the
task force in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 19.
Section 18 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
(United We Heal Medicaid Payment Program)
SECTION 20. (1) The United We Heal Medicaid Payment Program is  established in the
Oregon Health Authority. The  goal of the program is to increase the available behavioral
health care workforce in this state. The authority shall provide supplemental medical as-
sistance payments to eligible behavioral health care providers to enable the  providers to ac-
cess enhanced apprenticeship and training programs and opportunities by participating in a
labor-management training trust.
(2) The authority shall prescribe  by rule eligibility criteria for receiving the payments
consistent with the goal of the program expressed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) To participate in the program, a behavioral health provider must enter into a memo-
randum of  understanding with the authority specifying how the payments will be used. The
authority shall terminate payments if the provider fails to  abide by or violates the terms of
the memorandum of understanding. A provider may request a contested case proceeding to
challenge a termination.
(Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 21.
 ORS 750.055 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 18
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply  to health care service contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454, 731.485, as provided in subsection (2)  of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504, 731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to  731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230,  732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and 732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS 733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and  733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050, 743.100  to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788, 743.790 and 743B.221.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014, 743A.020,  743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100,  743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260,  743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013 , and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(i) ORS 743B.001,  743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195, 743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225, 743B.227,  743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253, 743B.254,
743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310, 743B.320,
743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407,
743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505, 743B.550,
743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation  of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the  Insurance Code apply to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice health maintenance  organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the group practice health maintenance organization  wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred  by a physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws  of the other state is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health  care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 19
(b) A health care service contractor’s  classification as a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 22.  ORS 750.055, as  amended by section 21, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2014, section 82, chapter 45, Oregon Laws 2014, section 9, chapter 59,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 100, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2015, section 11, chapter 362, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 470, Oregon Laws  2015, section
30, chapter 515, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 206,  Oregon Laws 2017, section 6, chapter
417, Oregon Laws  2017, section 22, chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2017, section 10, chapter 7, Oregon
Laws 2018, section 69, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2019, section 38, chapter  151, Oregon Laws 2019,
section 5, chapter 441, Oregon Laws 2019, section 85, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2021,  section 12,
chapter 37, Oregon Laws 2022, section 5, chapter  111, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 152,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service  contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454,  731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504,  731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230, 732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and  732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS  733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050,  743.100 to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788, 743.790 and 743B.221.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064,  743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160,  743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195,  743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225,  743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253, 743B.254,
743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310, 743B.320,
743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407,
743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452, 743B.453,  743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505, 743B.550,
743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to  744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 20
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the  Insurance Code apply to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice health maintenance  organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the group practice health maintenance organization  wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred  by a physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws  of the other state is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health  care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s  classification as a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services  may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 750.333 is amended to read:
750.333. (1) The following provisions apply  to trusts carrying out a multiple employer welfare
arrangement:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.268, 731.296 to 731.316, 731.324, 731.328,
731.378, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398, 731.406, 731.410, 731.414,  731.418 to 731.434, 731.454, 731.484,
731.486, 731.488, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,  731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to
731.992.
(c) ORS 733.010 to  733.050, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695 to 733.780.
(d) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(e) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061 and 742.065.
(f) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018,  743.020, 743.023, 743.028, 743.029,
743.053, 743.405, 743.406, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535 and 743B.221.
(g) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.024, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100,  743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.180, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252,  743A.260
and 743A.310 and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(h) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127 (except 743B.125 to 743B.127), 743B.195, 743B.197,
743B.200, 743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225,  743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258,  743B.310, 743B.320, 743B.321, 743B.330, 743B.340,
743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343, 743B.344, 743B.345, 743B.347,  743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407, 743B.420,
743B.423, 743B.451, 743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.505, 743B.550, 743B.555 and 743B.601.
(i) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to  744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(j) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160 and 746.220 to 746.370.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 21
(a) A trust carrying out a multiple employer welfare arrangement is an insurer.
(b) References to certificates of authority are references to certificates of multiple employer
welfare arrangement.
(c) Contributions are premiums.
(3) The provision of health benefits under ORS 750.301 to 750.341 is the transaction of  health
insurance.
(4) The Department of  Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules that are necessary to
implement the provisions of ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
DELIVERY OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
(Delivery Definition Based on State v. Boyd)
SECTION 24.
 ORS 475.005 is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to  475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use of a  drug short of dependence, without legal or
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by  injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration” means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of  a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It does not include a  common or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor classified in Schedules  I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act,  21 U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in  this paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(B) Any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, whether growing or not;
(C) Resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(D) The seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(E) Any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,  mixture or preparation of a plant, part of a
plant, resin or seed described in this paragraph; or
(F) Psilocybin or psilocin, but only if and to the extent that a  person manufactures, delivers, or
possesses psilocybin, psilocin, or psilocybin products in accordance with the provisions  of ORS
475A.210 to 475A.722 and rules adopted under ORS 475A.210 to 475A.722.
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance or its container  or labeling, which,
without authorization,  bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number
or device, or any likeness thereof,  of a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
(8) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer  of, or  pos-
session with the intent to transfer , other than by administering  or dispensing, from one person
to another , [ of] a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device” means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components, parts
or accessories, intended:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 22
(a) For  use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to  an ultimate user or research subject
by or  pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States  Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic  Pharmacopoeia  of the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended  for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the  structure or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of  any article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the term does not include devices or their  components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission”  means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer  terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction  from substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination  of ex-
traction  and  chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or la-
beling or relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the preparation or
compounding of a controlled substance:
(a) By a practitioner as an  incident to administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by an authorized agent under the  practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or  any
other legal entity.
(17) “Practitioner” means physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific investigator,  licensed nurse
practitioner, physician assistant or other person licensed,  registered or otherwise permitted by law
to dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course
of professional practice or research in this state but does not include a pharmacist or a pharmacy.
(18) “Prescription” means  a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given by a
practitioner for the preparation and use of a drug.  When the context requires, “prescription” also
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or  electronically transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under written, oral or  electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(19) “Production” includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting  of a
controlled substance.
(20) “Research” means an activity conducted by the  person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved  by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(21) “Ultimate user” means a person  who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the use
of the person or for the use  of a member of the household of the person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 23
(22) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An amount of a controlled  substance that is sufficient to physically weigh independent of its
packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
(b) An amount of a controlled substance that has  not been deemed unweighable, as determined
by a Department of State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of the  controlled
substance.
(23) “Within 30 feet,”  “within 500 feet” and  “within 1,000 feet” [ means] mean  a straight line
measurement in a radius extending for [ 1,000] the specified number of  feet or less in every direc-
tion from a specified location or from any point on the boundary line of a specified unit of property.
(Delivery in Certain Locations)
SECTION 25.
 ORS 475.900 is amended to read:
475.900. (1)  A violation of ORS 475.752, 475.806 to 475.894, 475.904 or 475.906 shall be classified
as crime category 8 of the  sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if:
(a) The violation constitutes delivery or manufacture of a controlled  substance and involves
substantial quantities  of a controlled substance. For purposes of this paragraph, the following
amounts constitute substantial quantities of the following controlled substances:
(A) Five grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(B) Five grams or more  or 25 or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a de-
tectable  amount  of fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the
State Board of Pharmacy;
(C) Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(D) Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount  of metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(E) Two hundred or more user units of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable amount
of lysergic acid diethylamide;
(F) Sixty grams or more of a mixture  or substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin; or
(G) Five grams or more  or 25 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(b) The violation constitutes possession, delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance  and
the possession, delivery  or manufacture is a commercial drug offense. A possession, delivery or
manufacture is a commercial drug offense for purposes of this subsection if it is accompanied by at
least three of the following factors:
(A) The delivery was of heroin, fentanyl, cocaine,  methamphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide,
psilocybin or psilocin and was for consideration;
(B) The offender was in possession of $300 or more in cash;
(C) The offender was unlawfully in possession of a firearm or other weapon as described in  ORS
166.270 (2), or the offender used, attempted to use or threatened to use a deadly or dangerous
weapon as defined in ORS 161.015,  or the offender was in possession of a firearm or other deadly
or dangerous weapon as defined in ORS 161.015 for the purpose of using  it in connection with a
controlled substance offense;
(D) The offender was in possession of materials being used for the packaging  of controlled sub-
stances such as scales, wrapping or foil, other  than the material being used to contain the substance
that is the subject of the offense;
(E) The offender was in possession of drug transaction records or customer lists;
(F) The offender was in possession of stolen property;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 24
(G) Modification of structures by painting, wiring, plumbing or lighting to facilitate a controlled
substance  offense;
(H) The offender was  in possession of manufacturing paraphernalia, including recipes, precursor
chemicals, laboratory equipment, lighting, ventilating or power generating equipment;
(I) The offender was using public lands for the manufacture of controlled substances;
(J) The offender had  constructed fortifications or had taken security measures with the potential
of injuring persons; or
(K) The offender was in possession of controlled substances in an amount greater than:
(i) Three grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(ii) Three grams or more or 15 or more user units of a  mixture or substance containing a de-
tectable amount of fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of  the
State Board of Pharmacy;
(iii) Eight grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(iv) Eight grams or more of  a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine;
(v) Twenty or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
lysergic acid diethylamide;
(vi) Ten grams or more  of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin; or
(vii) Four  grams or more or 20 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of:
(I) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(II) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(III) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(c) The violation constitutes a violation  of ORS 475.848, 475.852, 475.868, 475.872, 475.878,
475.882, 475.888, 475.892 or 475.904.
(d) The violation constitutes manufacturing methamphetamine and the manufacturing  consists
of:
(A) A chemical reaction involving one or more precursor substances for  the purpose of manu-
facturing methamphetamine; or
(B) Grinding, soaking or otherwise breaking  down a precursor substance for the purpose of
manufacturing methamphetamine.
(e) The  violation constitutes a violation of ORS 475.906 (1) or (2) that is not described in ORS
475.907.
(2) A violation of  ORS 475.752 or 475.806 to 475.894 shall be classified as crime category
7 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if the vio-
lation constitutes delivery for consideration  of heroin, cocaine, fentanyl, methamphetamine
or 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine,  3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine and:
(a) The  person knows, or reasonably should have known, that the delivery is occurring
within 500 feet of the real property comprising a treatment facility;
(b) The person knows, or reasonably should have known, that the delivery is  occurring
within 500 feet of the real property comprising a temporary residence shelter; or
(c) The delivery occurs within 30 feet of the real property comprising a public park.
[(2)] (3)  A violation of ORS 475.752  or 475.806 to 475.894 shall be classified as crime category
6 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if:
(a) The violation constitutes delivery of heroin, cocaine, fentanyl,  methamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine and is for consideration.
(b) The violation constitutes possession of substantial quantities of a controlled substance.  For
purposes of this paragraph, the following amounts constitute  substantial quantities of the following
controlled  substances:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 25
(A) Five grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(B) Five grams or more or 25 or more user units of a mixture or  substance containing a de-
tectable amount of fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of  the
State Board of Pharmacy;
(C) Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(D) Ten grams  or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine;
(E) Two hundred or more user  units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of lysergic acid diethylamide;
(F) Sixty grams or more of a mixture  or substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin; or
(G) Five grams or more or 25 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a  mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(4) A violation of  ORS 475.752 or 475.806 to 475.894 shall be classified as crime category
5 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if the vio-
lation constitutes delivery of heroin, cocaine,  fentanyl, methamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine and:
(a) The  person knows, or reasonably should have known, that the delivery is occurring
within 500 feet of the real property comprising a treatment facility;
(b) The person knows, or reasonably should have known, that the delivery is  occurring
within 500 feet of the real property comprising a temporary residence shelter; or
(c) The delivery occurs within 30 feet of the real property comprising a public park.
[(3)] (5)  Any felony violation of ORS 475.752 or 475.806 to 475.894  not contained in [ subsection
(1) or (2) ] subsections (1)  to (4)  of this section shall be classified as crime category 4 of the sen-
tencing guidelines grid  of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if the violation involves delivery
or manufacture of a controlled substance.
[(4)] (6)  In order to  prove a commercial drug offense, the state shall plead in the accusatory
instrument sufficient factors  of a commercial drug offense under [ subsections (1) and (2) ] subsection
(1) of this section. The state has the burden of proving each factor beyond a reasonable doubt.
[(5)] (7) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Mixture or substance” means any mixture or substance, whether or not  the mixture or
substance is in an ingestible or marketable form at the time of the offense.
(b) “Public park” means a park operated by the state, a county, a city or a park and re-
creation district.
(c) “Temporary residence shelter” means a building that provides shelter on  a temporary
basis for individuals and families who lack permanent housing.
(d) “Treatment facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 430.306.
(Reevaluation of Release Guidelines)
SECTION 26.
No later than June 1, 2024, the Chief Justice of the  Supreme Court, with
input from a criminal justice advisory committee appointed by the Chief  Justice, shall ree-
valuate and update the release guidelines for the pretrial release orders established under
ORS 135.233 for persons arrested for or charged with delivery or manufacture of  a controlled
substance.
SECTION 27.
Section 26 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
(Conforming Amendments)
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 26
SECTION 28.  ORS 475.752 is amended to read:
475.752. (1) Except as authorized by ORS 475.005 to  475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful
for any person  to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance. Any person who violates this sub-
section with respect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony, except as otherwise pro-
vided in ORS 475.886 and 475.890.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule  II, is guilty of a Class B felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.878, 475.880, 475.882, 475.904 and 475.906.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.904 and 475.906.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) Except as authorized in ORS  475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful for any
person to  create or deliver a counterfeit substance. Any person who violates this subsection with
respect to:
(a) A counterfeit substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony.
(b) A counterfeit substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B felony.
(c) A counterfeit substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony.
(d) A counterfeit substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A counterfeit substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(3) It is unlawful for any  person knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a
practitioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except  as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980. Any person who violates  this subsection with re-
spect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class E violation, except as  otherwise
provided in ORS 475.854, 475.874 and 475.894 and subsection (7) of this section.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class E violation,  except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.814, 475.824, 475.834 or 475.884 or subsection (8) of this section.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class E violation.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class E violation.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a violation.
(4) It is an affirmative defense in any prosecution under this section  for manufacture, possession
or delivery of the plant of the genus Lophophora commonly known as peyote that the peyote is being
used or is intended for use:
(a) In connection with the good faith practice of a religious belief;
(b) As directly associated with a religious practice; and
(c) In a manner that is not dangerous to the health of the user or  others who are in the prox-
imity of the user.
(5) The affirmative defense created in subsection (4) of this section is not available to any person
who has  possessed or delivered the peyote while incarcerated in a correctional facility in this state.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a person who unlawfully manufactures or
delivers a controlled substance in Schedule IV and who thereby causes death to another person  is
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, causation is established when the  controlled substance plays
a substantial role in the death of the other person.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section:
(a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule  I is a Class A misdemeanor if the
person possesses:
(A) Forty or more user units of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable amount of
lysergic acid diethylamide; or
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 27
(B) Twelve grams or more of a mixture  or substance containing a detectable amount of
psilocybin or psilocin.
(b) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 [ (2)(b)] (3)(b).
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section:
(a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a Class  A misdemeanor if the
person possesses one gram or more or five or more user units of a  mixture or substance containing
a detectable amount of fentanyl, or any substituted  derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules
of the State Board of Pharmacy.
(b) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 [ (2)(b)] (3)(b).
SECTION 29.
 ORS 475.854 is amended to read:
475.854. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess heroin.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of heroin is a Class E violation.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of heroin is a Class
A misdemeanor if  the person possesses one gram or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of heroin.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of heroin is
a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 [ (2)(b)] (3)(b).
SECTION 30.
 ORS 475.874 is amended to read:
475.874. (1)  It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class E violation.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class  A misdemeanor if the person possesses one gram or
more or five or more  pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of:
(A) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(B) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(C) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 [ (2)(b)] (3)(b).
SECTION 31.
 ORS 475.884 is amended to read:
475.884. (1)  It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess cocaine unless
the substance was obtained directly  from, or pursuant to[ ,] a valid prescription or order of , a prac-
titioner while acting  in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by
ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of cocaine is a Class E violation.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of cocaine is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person possesses two grams or more of a mixture or substance  containing a
detectable amount of cocaine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this  subsection, unlawful possession of cocaine is
a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 [ (2)(b)] (3)(b).
SECTION 32.
 ORS 475.894 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 28
475.894. (1) It is unlawful  for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess methamphetamine
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except  as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine is a Class E violation.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of methamphetamine
is a Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses two grams or  more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of metham-
phetamine is a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 [ (2)(b)] (3)(b).
(Applicability)
SECTION 33.
The amendments to ORS 475.005, 475.752, 475.854,  475.874, 475.884, 475.894
and 475.900 by sections 24, 25 and 28 to  32 of this 2024 Act apply to conduct occurring on or
after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
POSSESSION OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
(Drug Enforcement Misdemeanor Provisions)
SECTION 34. Section 35 of this 2024 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 35. (1) Unlawful possession of a  controlled substance constituting a drug
enforcement misdemeanor under ORS 475.752 (3)(a), (b), (c) or (d), 475.814  (2)(a), 475.824
(2)(a), 475.834 (2)(a), 475.854 (2)(a), 475.874 (2)(a), 475.884 (2)(a)  or 475.894 (2)(a) is punishable
as described in this section.
(2)(a) When imposing a sentence for the crime described in this section:
(A) The court may  decide to not suspend the imposition or execution of any part of the
sentence, and impose a term of incarceration in accordance with ORS 137.010 (7) of up to 180
days, only upon the request of the defendant.
(B) If the defendant has  not requested to be sentenced under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, or if the court has decided not to sentence the defendant under subparagraph  (A)
of this paragraph, the court  shall suspend the imposition of any sentence of incarceration
and, notwithstanding ORS 137.010 (4), impose a sentence of supervised probation of a definite
period of up to 18 months.
(b) When imposing  a sentence of probation under this section, the court may not order
as a condition of probation that the  defendant serve a sentence of incarceration or confine-
ment in the county jail.
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 135.050, 137.010 (7), 161.635 and 161.665,  the court may not in-
clude in the judgment of conviction for the crime described in  this section a requirement
that the defendant pay a fine, cost, assessment or attorney fee.
(d) ORS 137.540 (2)(a) does not apply to sentences imposed under this section.
(3)(a) Structured, intermediate sanctions as described  in ORS 137.593 may be imposed in
accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595  when a condition of a term of probation
imposed under this section has been violated.
(b) Upon a  finding that the person on probation has violated a condition of probation
imposed under this section, the court may impose a sanction, which may include days in  jail.
(c) The total amount of  jail that a person may receive pursuant to structured, interme-
diate sanctions, or a court-imposed  sanctions, on a probation imposed under this section is
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 29
30 days. Any term of incarceration imposed as a sanction must  allow for early release to a
treatment facility.
(d) The court may extend the  length of a probation sentence imposed under this section
if the  person on probation consents to the extension. The total term of probation may not
exceed five years.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 137.545 (5)(a)(B) and 137.593, upon the court’s revocation of
a sentence of probation imposed under this section, the court may  impose as a revocation
sentence up to 180 days’ incarceration. For any sentence of incarceration  imposed under this
paragraph, the court  shall authorize early release to an inpatient or outpatient drug and al-
cohol treatment program as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Upon imposing a revocation sentence  of incarceration under this subsection, the
court shall commit the person to the custody of the  supervisory authority under ORS
137.124. The county community corrections agency shall  monitor when an inpatient or out-
patient drug and alcohol treatment program becomes available for the person and shall no-
tify the person when a program is available. In order to be released early to the  program,
the person must  enter into a revocation release agreement subject to such conditions as
determined by the county community corrections  agency. If the person violates the terms
of the revocation release  agreement, the county community corrections agency may cause
the person to return to jail to serve the remainder  of the incarceration sentence originally
imposed.
(c) When a person has been released to an inpatient or  outpatient drug and alcohol
treatment program under paragraph (b) of this  subsection, each day that the person is in the
community and subject to the revocation release  agreement shall count toward the total
term of incarceration imposed as a revocation sentence.
(d) When imposing a revocation sentence of  incarceration under this section, the court
shall order, and may not  deny, that the person receive credit for time served for any day
that the person was previously incarcerated on the charge.
(Deflection Programs)
SECTION 36. (1) Law enforcement agencies in this  state are encouraged to, in lieu of
citation or arrest, or after citation or arrest but before referral to the district  attorney,
refer a person to a deflection  program when the person is suspected of committing, or has
been cited or arrested for, unlawful possession of a controlled substance  constituting a drug
enforcement misdemeanor under section 35 of this 2024 Act.
(2) District attorneys in this state are  encouraged to divert for assessment, treatment
and other services, in lieu of conviction, cases involving unlawful possession of  a controlled
substance constituting a drug enforcement misdemeanor under section 35 of this 2024 Act.
(3) If a deflection program is established, the  program coordinator shall be responsible
for providing notification that a person  has completed the program to those entities re-
sponsible for sealing records under section  54 of this 2024 Act, including but not limited to
law enforcement agencies, district attorneys and courts.
(4) As used  in this section, “deflection program” has the meaning given that term in
section 37 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 37. (1) The Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission shall establish a statewide
system for  tracking simple, clear and meaningful data concerning deflection program out-
comes, including connections to social services  and criminal justice system avoidance, and
other data deemed relevant that is timely and easily accessed  to inform best practices and
improve outcomes for individual program participants.
(2)(a) No later than 12 months after the effective date of this 2024 Act,  the commission
shall conduct a study to determine best practices for deflection  programs and make recom-
mendations for funding of the Oregon Behavioral Health  Deflection Program described in
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 30
section 76 of this 2024 Act. In making the recommendations  described in this paragraph, the
commission shall consider the best available  information and projections regarding deflection
programs in this state.
(b) No later  than 18 months after the effective date of this 2024 Act, the commission shall
develop standards and best practices for deflection  programs in this state based on infor-
mation received from the programs and pursuant to sections 76 and 77 of this 2024 Act.
(3) The commission shall maintain  a list of deflection programs operating within this
state, and shall make the list publicly available on the website of the commission.
(4) As used in this section, “deflection program”  means a collaborative program between
law enforcement agencies and  behavioral health entities that assists individuals who may
have substance use disorder, another  behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders,
to create community-based pathways to treatment, recovery support services, housing,  case
management or other services.
SECTION 38.  ORS 133.060 is amended to read:
133.060. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3)  and (4) of this section,  a person who has
been served with a criminal citation shall appear before a magistrate  of the county in which the
person was cited at the time, date and court specified in the citation, which shall not  be later than
30 days after the date the citation was issued.
(2) If the cited person fails to  appear at the time, date and court specified in the criminal cita-
tion, and a complaint or information is filed, the magistrate shall issue a warrant  of arrest, upon
application for its issuance, upon the person’s failure to appear.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  during a period of statewide emergency, the
date specified in a criminal citation on which a person served with the citation shall  appear may
be more than 30 days after the date the citation was issued.
(b) During a period of statewide emergency, the presiding judge of a circuit  court may, upon the
motion of a party or the court’s own motion, and upon a finding  of good cause, postpone the date
of appearance described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection for all proceedings within the jurisdic-
tion of the court.
(c) The presiding judge may delegate  the authority described in paragraph (b) of this subsection
to another judge of the court.
(d) Nothing in this subsection affects  the rights of a defendant under the Oregon and United
States Constitutions.
(e) As used in this  subsection, “period of statewide emergency” means the period of time during
which any declaration of a state of emergency under  ORS 401.165, public health emergency under
ORS 433.441 or  catastrophic disaster under Article X-A, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution, issued
by the Governor, and any extension of the declaration, is in  effect, and continuing for 60 days after
the declaration and any extension is no longer in effect.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, the date specified in a criminal citation
on which a person served with the citation shall appear may be more than 30 days after  the
date the  citation was issued for purposes of allowing the person to participate in a deflection
program as defined in section 37 of this 2024 Act.
(Drug Enforcement Misdemeanor Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 39.  ORS 475.752, as amended by section 28 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
475.752. (1) Except as authorized by ORS 475.005 to  475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful
for any person to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance. Any person who violates  this sub-
section with respect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony, except as otherwise pro-
vided in ORS 475.886 and 475.890.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class  B felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.878, 475.880, 475.882, 475.904 and 475.906.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 31
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.904 and 475.906.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) Except as authorized in ORS  475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful for any
person to create or deliver a counterfeit substance. Any person who violates this subsection  with
respect  to:
(a) A counterfeit substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony.
(b) A counterfeit substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B felony.
(c) A counterfeit substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony.
(d) A counterfeit substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A counterfeit substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(3) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally  to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a
practitioner while acting in  the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285  and 475.752 to 475.980. Any person who violates this subsection with re-
spect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a [ Class E  violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act , except  as otherwise pro-
vided in ORS 475.854, 475.874 and 475.894 and subsection (7) of this section.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule II, is guilty of  a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act , except  as otherwise pro-
vided in ORS 475.814, 475.824, 475.834 or 475.884 or subsection (8) of this section.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule  III, is guilty of a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of  a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a violation.
(4) It is an affirmative defense in any prosecution under this section  for manufacture, possession
or delivery of the plant of the genus Lophophora commonly known as peyote that the peyote is being
used or is intended for use:
(a) In connection with the good faith practice of a religious belief;
(b) As directly associated with a religious practice; and
(c) In a manner that is not  dangerous to the health of the user or others who are in the prox-
imity of the user.
(5) The affirmative defense created in subsection (4) of this section is not available to any person
who has  possessed or delivered the peyote while incarcerated in a correctional facility in this state.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a  person who unlawfully manufactures or
delivers  a  controlled substance in Schedule IV and who thereby causes death to another person is
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, causation is established when the  controlled substance plays
a substantial role in the death of the other person.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section:
(a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule  I is a Class A misdemeanor if the
person possesses:
(A) Forty or more user units of  a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
lysergic acid diethylamide; or
(B) Twelve grams or more of a mixture  or substance containing a detectable amount of
psilocybin or psilocin.
(b) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (3)(b).
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 32
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section:
(a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a Class  A misdemeanor if the
person possesses one gram or more or five or more user units of a  mixture or substance containing
a detectable amount of fentanyl, or any substituted  derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules
of the State Board of Pharmacy.
(b) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (3)(b).
SECTION 40.
 ORS 475.814 is amended to read:
475.814. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or  intentionally to possess hydrocodone
unless the hydrocodone was obtained  directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of,
a practitioner while acting in the course of  professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of hydrocodone is a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of hydrocodone is a
Class A misdemeanor if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses 40 or more  pills, tablets, capsules or user units of a mixture or sub-
stance containing a detectable amount of hydrocodone.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 475.824 is amended to read:
475.824. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or  intentionally to possess methadone unless
the methadone was obtained directly  from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a prac-
titioner while acting  in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by
ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methadone is a [ Class E  violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of methadone is a
Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40 or more user units of a  mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of methadone.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession  of methadone
is a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b).
SECTION 42.  ORS 475.834 is amended to read:
475.834. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess oxycodone  unless
the oxycodone was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of,  a practi-
tioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful  possession of oxycodone is a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of  oxycodone is a
Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40 or more pills, tablets, capsules  or user units of a
mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of oxycodone.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession  of oxycodone
is a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b).
SECTION 43.
 ORS 475.854, as amended by section 29 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
475.854. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess heroin.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of heroin is a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement misdemeanor
punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of heroin is a Class
A misdemeanor if  the person possesses one gram or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of heroin.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 33
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of heroin is
a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (3)(b).
SECTION 44.
 ORS 475.874, as amended by section 30 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
475.874. (1)  It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is  a [ Class E violation ] drug
enforcement misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses  one gram or
more or five or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable
amount of:
(A) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(B) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(C) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (3)(b).
SECTION 45.
 ORS 475.884, as amended by section 31 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
475.884. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess cocaine  unless
the substance was obtained directly  from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a practi-
tioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of cocaine is a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement misdemeanor
punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of cocaine is  a Class
A misdemeanor if  the person possesses two grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of cocaine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of  this subsection, unlawful possession of cocaine is
a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (3)(b).
SECTION 46.
 ORS 475.894, as amended by section 32 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
475.894. (1) It is unlawful  for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess methamphetamine
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner while acting in  the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful  possession of methamphetamine is a [ Class E violation ] drug enforcement
misdemeanor punishable as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of methamphetamine
is a Class A misdemeanor if the  person possesses two grams or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of metham-
phetamine is a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (3)(b).
SECTION 46a.
 ORS 135.753 is amended to read:
135.753. (1) If the court directs the  charge or action to be dismissed, the defendant, if in custody,
shall be discharged. If the defendant has been released, the release agreement is exonerated and
security deposited shall be refunded to the defendant.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 34
(2) An order for the dismissal of a charge or action, as provided in ORS 135.703  to 135.709 and
135.745 to 135.757, is a bar to another prosecution for the same crime if the crime is a  Class B or
C misdemeanor; but it is not a bar if  the crime charged is a Class A misdemeanor , a misdemeanor
described in section 35 of this 2024 Act  or a felony.
(3) If any charge or action is dismissed for the purpose  of consolidation with one or more other
charges or actions, then any such dismissal shall  not be a bar to another prosecution for the same
offense.
(Supervision Duty and Funding)
SECTION 47.  ORS 423.478 is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations  between sanctions, supervision, services and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to ORS 423.483, each county, in partnership with the department, shall assume re-
sponsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions and services for  offenders convicted of felo-
nies, designated drug-related misdemeanors or designated person misdemeanors , or  persons who
have entered into a probation agreement on a drug enforcement misdemeanor pursuant to
section 52 of this 2024 Act,  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after  January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition of  parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding  the fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of incarceration,
when an offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county under  ORS
137.124 (2) or  (4), the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by the  supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and  the person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS 163A.010,  the supervisory authority, as a condition of release, shall order the
person to report to the Department of State Police, a city police department or  a county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day  the person works at, carries on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or  attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,”  “institution of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of a Schedule I controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (3)(a);
(B) Unlawful possession of a Schedule II controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (3)(b);
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 35
(C) Unlawful possession of a Schedule III controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (3)(c);
(D) Unlawful possession of a Schedule IV controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (3)(d);
(E) Unlawful possession of a Schedule I controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (7)(a);
[(A)] (F)  Unlawful possession of fentanyl under ORS 475.752 (8)(a);
(G) Unlawful possession of hydrocodone under ORS 475.814 (2)(a);
(H) Unlawful possession of hydrocodone under ORS 475.814 (2)(b);
(I) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(a);
[(B)] (J) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(b);
(K) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(a);
[(C)] (L)  Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(b);
(M) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(a);
[(D)] (N) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(b);
(O) Unlawful possession  of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874
(2)(a);
[(E)] (P)  Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874 (2)(b);
(Q) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(a);
[(F)] (R)  Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(b); [ or]
(S) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(a); or
[(G)] (T) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(b).
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” means:
(A) Assault in the  fourth degree constituting domestic violence if the judgment document is as
described in ORS 163.160 (4);
(B) Menacing constituting domestic violence if the judgment document is as  described in ORS
163.190 (3); or
(C) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 423.483 is amended to read:
423.483. (1)(a)  The baseline funding for biennia beginning after June 30, 1999, is the current
service level for the expenses of providing management, support  services, supervision and sanctions
for offenders described in ORS 423.478 (2). At  a minimum, each biennium’s appropriation must be
established at this baseline.
(b) The baseline funding described in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) May not be decreased as a result of a reduction under ORS 137.633.
(B) May not be increased as a result of community-based sanctions, services and programs that
are funded under section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013.
(2) If the total state community corrections appropriation  is less than the baseline calculated
under subsection (1) of this section, a county may discontinue participation by written notification
to the director 180 days prior to implementation of the change. If a county  discontinues partic-
ipation, the responsibility for correctional services transferred to  the county and the portion of
funding made available to the county under ORS 423.530 revert  to the Department of Corrections.
Responsibility for supervision of and provision of correctional services to  misdemeanor offenders
does not revert to the department under any  circumstances except those of offenders convicted of
designated drug-related misdemeanors or designated person misdemeanors , or of persons who  have
entered into a probation agreement on a drug enforcement misdemeanor  pursuant to section
52 of this 2024 Act .
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Current service level”  means the calculated cost of continuing current legislatively funded
programs, phased in programs and increased caseloads minus  one-time costs, decreased caseloads,
phased out programs and pilot programs with the remainder adjusted for  inflation as determined by
the Legislative Assembly in its biennial appropriation to the Department of Corrections.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 36
SECTION 49.  ORS 423.483, as amended by section 22, chapter 649,  Oregon Laws 2013, section
3, chapter 140, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended  to
read:
423.483. (1)(a) The baseline funding for biennia beginning after June 30, 1999, is the  current
service level for the expenses of providing management, support  services, supervision and sanctions
for offenders described in ORS 423.478 (2). At  a minimum, each biennium’s appropriation must be
established at this baseline.
(b) The baseline funding described in paragraph (a) of this subsection  may not be decreased as
a result of a reduction under ORS 137.633.
(2) If the total state community corrections appropriation  is less than the baseline calculated
under subsection (1) of this section, a county may discontinue participation by written notification
to the director 180 days prior to implementation of the change. If a county  discontinues partic-
ipation, the responsibility for correctional services transferred to  the county and the portion of
funding made available to the county under ORS 423.530 revert  to the Department of Corrections.
Responsibility for supervision of and provision of correctional services to  misdemeanor offenders
does not revert to the department under any  circumstances except those of offenders convicted of
designated drug-related misdemeanors or designated person misdemeanors , or of persons who  have
entered into a probation agreement on a drug enforcement misdemeanor  pursuant to section
52 of this 2024 Act .
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Current service level”  means the calculated cost of continuing current legislatively funded
programs, phased in programs and increased caseloads minus  one-time costs, decreased caseloads,
phased out programs and pilot programs with the remainder adjusted for  inflation as determined by
the Legislative Assembly in its biennial appropriation to the Department of Corrections.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 423.525 is amended to read:
423.525. (1) A county, group of  counties or intergovernmental corrections entity shall apply to
the Director of the Department of Corrections in a manner and form prescribed by the  director for
funding made available under ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The application shall include a community
corrections  plan.  The Department of Corrections shall provide consultation and technical assistance
to counties to aid in the development and implementation of community corrections plans.
(2)(a) From July 1, 1995, until June 30, 1999, a county, group of counties or  intergovernmental
corrections entity may  make application requesting funding for the construction, acquisition, ex-
pansion or remodeling of correctional facilities to serve the county, group of  counties or intergov-
ernmental corrections entity. The department shall review the  application for funding of
correctional facilities in accordance with criteria that consider design, cost, capacity,  need, operat-
ing efficiency and viability based on the county’s,  group of counties’ or intergovernmental cor-
rections entity’s ability to provide for ongoing operations.
(b)(A) If the application is approved, the department shall present the  application with a request
to finance the facility with financing agreements to the State  Treasurer and the Director of the
Oregon  Department  of Administrative Services. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph, upon approval of the request by the State Treasurer and the Director of  the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, the facility may be financed with financing agree-
ments, and  certificates of participation issued pursuant thereto, as provided in ORS 283.085 to
283.092. All decisions approving or denying applications and  requests for financing under this sec-
tion are final. No such decision is subject to judicial review of any kind.
(B) If requests to finance county  correctional facility projects are submitted after February 22,
1996, and the requests have not  been approved by the department on the date a session of the
Legislative Assembly convenes, the requests are also subject to the  approval of the Legislative As-
sembly.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 37
(c) After approval  but prior to the solicitation of bids or proposals for the construction of a
project, the county, group  of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity and the department
shall enter into a written agreement that determines the procedures,  and the parties responsible, for
the awarding of contracts and  the administration of the construction project for the approved
correctional facility. If  the parties are unable to agree on the terms of the written agreement, the
Governor shall decide the terms of the agreement. The Governor’s decision is final.
(d) After approval of a construction project, the administration of  the project shall be conducted
as provided in the agreement required by  paragraph (c) of this subsection. The agreement must re-
quire at  a minimum that the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity shall
submit to the department any change  order or alteration of the design of the project that, singly
or in the aggregate, reduces the capacity of the correctional facility or  materially changes the ser-
vices or functions of the project. The change order or alteration is not effective until  approved by
the department. In reviewing the change order  or alteration, the department shall consider whether
the implementation of the change order or alteration will have any material  adverse impact on the
parties to any financing agreements or the holders of any certificates of participation issued to  fund
county correctional facilities under this section.  In making its decision, the department may rely on
the opinions of the Department of Justice, bond counsel or professional financial advisers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS  283.085, for purposes of this section, “financing agreement” means a
lease purchase agreement, an installment sale agreement, a  loan agreement or any other agreement
to finance a correctional facility described in this section, or  to refinance a previously executed fi-
nancing agreement for the financing of a correctional facility. The state is not required to own or
operate a correctional facility in order to finance it under ORS 283.085 to 283.092  and this section.
The state, an intergovernmental corrections entity, county or group of counties may enter into any
agreements, including, but not limited to, leases  and subleases, that are reasonably necessary or
generally accepted by the financial community for  purposes of acquiring or securing financing as
authorized by this section. In financing county correctional  facilities under this section, “property
rights” as used in ORS 283.085  includes leasehold mortgages of the state’s rights under leases of
correctional facilities from counties.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law,  county charter or ordinance, a county may
convey or lease to  the State of Oregon, acting by and through the Department of Corrections, title
to interests in, or a lease of, any real property, facilities or personal property owned  by the county
for the purpose of  financing the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a correctional
facility. Upon the payment of all principal and interest on, or  upon any other satisfaction of, the
financing agreement used to finance the construction, acquisition, expansion or  remodeling of a
correctional facility, the  state shall reconvey its interest in, or terminate and surrender its leasehold
of, the  property or facilities, including the financed construction, acquisition, expansion or remod-
eling, to the county. In addition to any authority granted by ORS 283.089, for  the purposes of ob-
taining financing, the state may enter into agreements under which the state may grant  to trustees
or lenders leases, subleases and  other security interests in county property conveyed or leased to
the state under this subsection and in the property or facilities financed by financing agreements.
(5) In connection with the financing of correctional facilities,  the Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services may bill  the Department of Corrections, and the Department
of Corrections shall pay the amounts billed, in the same manner as provided in ORS 283.089.  As
required by ORS 283.091,  the Department of Corrections and the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall include in the  Governor’s budget all amounts that will be due in each fiscal
period under financing agreements for correctional facilities. Amounts payable by the  state under
a financing agreement for the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling  of a correctional
facility  are  limited to available funds as defined in ORS 283.085, and no lender, trustee, certificate
holder or county has any claim or recourse against any funds of the state other than available funds.
(6) The director shall adopt rules that  may be necessary for the administration, evaluation and
implementation of ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The standards shall be sufficiently flexible to  foster the
development of new and improved  supervision or rehabilitative practices and maximize local control.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 38
(7) When a county assumes responsibility under ORS 423.500 to 423.560  for correctional services
previously provided by the department, the county and  the department shall enter into an inter-
governmental agreement that includes a local community corrections plan consisting of  program
descriptions, budget allocation, performance objectives and methods of evaluating  each correctional
service to be provided  by the county. The performance objectives must include in dominant part
reducing future criminal conduct.  The methods of evaluating services must include, to the extent
of available information systems resources, the collection  and analysis of data sufficient to deter-
mine the apparent effect of the services on future criminal conduct.
(8) All community corrections plans shall comply with rules adopted pursuant to ORS  423.500
to 423.560, and shall include  but need not be limited to an outline of the basic structure and the
supervision, services and local sanctions to be applied to offenders  convicted of felonies, designated
drug-related misdemeanors and designated person misdemeanors , or persons who have entered
into a probation agreement  on a drug enforcement misdemeanor pursuant to section 52 of
this 2024 Act,  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board  of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision  to 12 months or less incarceration for a violation of a condition of parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; and
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(9) All community corrections plans shall  designate a community corrections manager of the
county or counties and shall provide that  the administration of community corrections under ORS
423.500 to 423.560 shall be under such manager.
(10) No amendment to or modification  of a county-approved community corrections plan shall
be placed in effect without prior notice to the director for purposes of statewide data collection and
reporting.
(11) The obligation of  the state to provide funding and the scheduling for providing funding of
a project approved  under this section is dependent upon the ability of the state to access public
security markets to sell financing agreements.
(12) No later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Evaluate the community corrections policy established in ORS 423.475,  423.478, 423.483 and
423.500 to 423.560; and
(b) Assess the effectiveness of local revocation options.
(13) As used in this section, “designated drug-related  misdemeanor” and “designated person
misdemeanor” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 423.478.
(Conditional Discharge)
SECTION 51.
Section 52 of this 2024 Act is  added to and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 52. (1)(a) When a  person is charged with unlawful possession of a controlled
substance under ORS 475.752 (3)(a), (b), (c) or (d), 475.814 (2)(a),  475.824 (2)(a), 475.834 (2)(a),
475.854 (2)(a), 475.874 (2)(a), 475.884 (2)(a) or 475.894 (2)(a) constituting a  drug enforcement
misdemeanor as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act, the person is  eligible to enter, and
subject to  paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection may request to enter, into a probation
agreement as described in this section.
(b) The district attorney may object to the  defendant’s entry into a probation agreement
under this section. After hearing  the reasons for the objection, the court may deny the
person’s entry if the probation  agreement would not serve the needs of the person or the
protection and welfare of the community.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 39
(c) A person may request to enter into a probation agreement  under this section no later
than 30 days after the person’s  first appearance, unless the court authorizes a later date for
good cause  shown. For purposes of this paragraph, the filing of a demurrer, a motion to
suppress or a motion for an omnibus hearing does not constitute good cause.
(d) When  a person enters into a probation agreement under this section, the court shall
defer further proceedings on the charge described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection and
place the person on probation. The terms of the probation shall be defined  by a probation
agreement.
(e) A person may enter into a probation agreement under this section on the charge  de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection regardless of whether the person is charged with
other offenses within the same charging instrument or as part of a separate  charging in-
strument, but the proceedings on the other offenses continue in the  normal course and are
not deferred.
(2)(a) A probation agreement described in this section carries  the understanding that if
the defendant fulfills the terms of the agreement, the  charge described in subsection (1)(a)
of this section that is the subject of the agreement will be dismissed with prejudice.
(b) The initial term of probation shall be  12 months, subject to early termination by the
court. The terms of the  probation shall include the general conditions of probation described
in ORS 137.540 (1) and a requirement that the defendant complete a substance abuse  evalu-
ation and any treatment recommended by the evaluator. The court  may impose sanctions
of up to a total of 30 days of imprisonment upon finding that the person has violated the
conditions of probation. Structured, intermediate sanctions as described in ORS 137.593  may
be imposed in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595 when  the conditions of a
term of probation described in this section have been violated.
(c) The agreement must contain a waiver of the following rights of  the defendant with
respect to each criminal charge:
(A) The right to a speedy trial and trial by jury;
(B) The right to present evidence on the defendant’s behalf;
(C) The right to confront and cross-examine witnesses against the defendant;
(D) The right to contest evidence presented against the defendant,  including the right to
object to hearsay evidence; and
(E) The right to appeal from a judgment of conviction resulting from an  adjudication of
guilt entered under subsection (3) of this section, unless  the appeal is based on an allegation
that the sentence exceeds the maximum allowed by law or constitutes cruel and  unusual
punishment.
(d) The agreement may not contain a requirement that the defendant enter a plea  of
guilty or no contest on any charge in the accusatory instrument.
(e) The fact  that a person has entered into a probation agreement under this section does
not constitute an admission of guilt and is not sufficient to warrant a finding or  adjudication
of guilt by a court.
(f) Police reports or other documents associated with the criminal charges in a court file
other than the probation agreement may  not be admitted into evidence, and do not establish
a factual basis for finding the defendant guilty,  unless the court resumes criminal pro-
ceedings and enters an adjudication of guilt under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Upon violation of a term or condition of the probation agreement, the court may im-
pose a sanction or may resume the criminal proceedings and may find  the defendant guilty
of the charge that is the subject of the agreement in accordance  with the waiver of rights
in the agreement. The defendant may not contest the sufficiency  of the evidence establishing
the defendant’s guilt of the offenses in the accusatory instrument.
(4) Upon the conclusion or early termination of  the probation period, if the court has
received notice from the  district attorney or a supervising officer that the person has ful-
filled the terms and conditions of the probation agreement, the court shall discharge  the
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 40
person and dismiss the charge that is the  subject of the agreement. Discharge and dismissal
under this section shall be without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction for  purposes
of this section or  for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon con-
viction of a crime.
(5) In the event that the period of probation under this section  expires, but the court has
not received notice that the terms and conditions of the probation  agreement have been
fulfilled and  no probation violation proceeding was initiated prior to the expiration of the
period of probation, the  court may not discharge the person and dismiss the proceedings
against the person. The court shall instead issue  an order requiring the person to appear and
to show cause why the court  should not enter an adjudication of guilt as described in sub-
section (3) of this section due to the failure of the person to fulfill the terms and conditions
of the probation  agreement prior to expiration of the period of probation. At the hearing on
the order to show cause, after considering any evidence or argument  from the district at-
torney and the person, the court may:
(a) Order a new period of probation  to allow the person to fulfill the terms and conditions
of the probation agreement; or
(b) Enter an adjudication of guilt as described in subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 475.245 is amended to read:
475.245. (1)(a) Whenever a person is charged  with an offense listed in subsection (5) of this
section,  the  court, with the consent of the district attorney and the person, may defer further pro-
ceedings and place the person  on probation. The terms of the probation shall be defined by a pro-
bation agreement.
(b) A probation agreement carries the understanding that  if the defendant fulfills the terms of
the agreement, the criminal charges filed against the defendant will be dismissed with prejudice.
(c) The  agreement must contain a waiver of the following rights of the defendant with respect
to each criminal charge:
(A) The right to a speedy trial and trial by jury;
(B) The right to present evidence on the defendant’s behalf;
(C) The right to confront and cross-examine witnesses against the defendant;
(D) The right to contest evidence presented against the defendant, including the right to  object
to hearsay evidence; and
(E) The right to appeal from a judgment of conviction  resulting from an adjudication of guilt
entered under subsection (2) of this section, unless the appeal is based on an  allegation that the
sentence exceeds the maximum allowed by law or constitutes cruel and unusual punishment.
(d) The agreement must include a requirement  that the defendant pay any restitution owed to
the victim as determined by the court,  and any fees for court-appointed counsel ordered by the court
under ORS 135.050.
(e) The agreement may not contain  a requirement that the defendant enter a plea of guilty or
no contest on any charge in the accusatory instrument.
(f) Entering into a probation agreement does not  constitute an admission of guilt and is not
sufficient to warrant a finding or adjudication of guilt by a court.
(g) Police reports or other documents associated with the criminal charges in  a court file other
than the probation agreement may  not be admitted into evidence, and do not establish a factual
basis for finding the defendant guilty, unless the court  resumes criminal proceedings and enters an
adjudication of guilt under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Upon violation of a term or condition of the probation agreement, the court may impose
sanctions of up to a  total of 30 days of imprisonment, or  resume the criminal proceedings and
may find the defendant guilty of  the offenses in the accusatory instrument in accordance with the
waiver of rights in the probation agreement. The defendant may  not contest the sufficiency of the
evidence establishing the defendant’s guilt of the offenses in the accusatory instrument.
(3) Upon  fulfillment of the terms and conditions of the probation agreement, the court shall
discharge  the  person and dismiss the proceedings against the person. Discharge and dismissal under
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 41
this section shall be without adjudication of  guilt and is not a conviction for purposes of this section
or for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by  law upon conviction of a crime. There
may be only one discharge and dismissal under this section with respect to any person.
(4) In the event that the period of probation  under this section expires, but the terms and con-
ditions of the probation agreement have not been fulfilled  and no probation violation proceeding
was initiated prior to the expiration of the period of probation, the court may not discharge  the
person and dismiss the proceedings against the person. The court shall instead issue an order  re-
quiring the person to appear and to show cause why the  court should not enter an adjudication of
guilt as described in subsection (2) of this section due to the  failure of the person to fulfill the terms
and conditions of the probation agreement prior to expiration of  the period of probation. At the
hearing on the order to show cause, after considering any evidence  or argument from the district
attorney and the person, the court may:
(a) Order a new period of probation to allow the person  to fulfill the terms and conditions of the
probation agreement; or
(b) Enter an adjudication of guilt as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) This section applies to the following offenses:
(a) Possession of a controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (3),  475.814, 475.824, 475.834, 475.854,
475.874, 475.884 or 475.894;
(b) Unlawfully possessing a prescription drug under ORS 689.527 (6);
(c) Unlawfully possessing marijuana  plants, usable marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid
concentrates or cannabinoid extracts as described in ORS 475C.337 or 475C.341, if the offense is a
misdemeanor or felony;
(d) Endangering the welfare of a minor under ORS 163.575 (1)(b);
(e) Frequenting a place where controlled substances are used under ORS 167.222; and
(f) A property offense that is motivated by  a dependence on a controlled substance or a
marijuana item as defined in ORS 475C.009.
(Expungement)
SECTION 54.
(1) Within 60 days of receiving verification from a deflection program co-
ordinator that a person has completed a deflection program,  after being referred to the
program due to the alleged commission of  unlawful possession of a controlled substance
constituting a  drug enforcement misdemeanor as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act, a
law enforcement agency or district attorney shall seal all records related to the person’s
participation in the program, the alleged conduct that resulted in the referral to the program
and, if applicable, the citation for  the offense, and a court shall seal all electronic records
that may have been created concerning the  offense. Records sealed under this subsection are
not subject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 or any other law.
(2) After two years have  elapsed from the date that a person is cited for unlawful pos-
session of a  controlled substance constituting a drug enforcement misdemeanor as described
in section 35 of this 2024 Act, and if no further prosecutorial action on the citation has oc-
curred, within 60 days after the conclusion of the two year time period, any  law enforcement
agency or district attorney that possesses records related to the citation, and any  court that
possesses electronic records related to the citation, shall seal the  records. Records sealed
under this subsection are not subject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 or  any other
law.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 137.225,  when a person successfully completes a probation
agreement and the court discharges the person and dismisses the proceedings against the
person under section  52 (4) of this 2024 Act, the court shall, within 90 days after the dis-
missal, enter an order sealing all records related to the arrest or  citation and the criminal
proceedings. The clerk of  the court shall forward a copy of the order, or a certified copy if
requested, to such agencies as directed by the court.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 42
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 137.225, when the court  receives notice that a defendant has
successfully completed a term of  probation for unlawful possession of a controlled substance
constituting a drug enforcement misdemeanor as described in section 35 of  this 2024 Act, the
court shall, within 90 days after the notification, enter an order sealing all  records related
to the arrest or citation and the criminal proceedings. The clerk of the court shall  forward
a copy of the order, or a certified copy if requested, to such agencies as directed by the
court.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 137.225, after three  years have passed from the date of entry
of judgment  of conviction for unlawful possession of a controlled substance constituting a
drug enforcement misdemeanor as described in section  35 of this 2024 Act, the court shall,
within 60 days after the three year period has concluded, enter an order sealing all  records
related to the arrest or citation, charges and  conviction. The clerk of the court shall forward
a copy of the order, or a certified copy if requested, to such agencies as directed by the
court.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 137.225, after three  years have passed since the dismissal of a
unlawful possession of a controlled substance constituting a drug  enforcement misdemeanor
as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act, if the court has not sealed records of the  offense
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section,  the court shall, within 60 days after the three year
period has concluded, enter an order sealing all records related to  the arrest or citation and
any criminal proceedings. The clerk of the court shall forward a  copy of the order, or a
certified copy if requested, to such agencies as directed by the court.
(5)(a) The State Court Administrator shall develop a standardized form for  obtaining the
information necessary for all entities to seal records as required  by subsections (3) and (4)
of this section.
(b) When a person enters into a probation agreement under section 52 of this 2024  Act,
or is convicted of unlawful possession of a controlled substance  constituting a drug
enforcement misdemeanor as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act, the district attorney
and the defense attorney shall ensure that a copy of the form  described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection is completed and submitted to the court.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 137.225 is amended to read:
137.225. (1)(a) At any time after the person  becomes eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, any person convicted of an offense  who has fully complied with and performed the sen-
tence of the court for the offense, and  whose conviction is described in subsection (5) of this section,
by motion may apply to the court where the conviction was entered for entry  of an order setting
aside the conviction. A person who is still under supervision as part  of the sentence for the offense
that is the subject of the motion has not fully complied with or performed the sentence of the  court.
(b) A person is eligible to file a motion under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) For a Class B felony, seven years from the date of conviction or the release of the person
from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(B) For a Class C felony, five years  from the date of conviction or the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(C) For a Class A misdemeanor, three years from the date of conviction or the  release of the
person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(D) For a Class B or Class C misdemeanor, a violation or the  finding of a person in contempt
of court, one year from the date of conviction or finding or the release of  the person from
imprisonment for the conviction or finding sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(c) If no accusatory instrument is filed, at any time after 60 days from  the date the prosecuting
attorney  indicates  that the state has elected not to proceed with a prosecution or contempt pro-
ceeding, an arrested, cited or charged person may apply to  the court in the county in which the
person was arrested,  cited or charged, for entry of an order setting aside the record of the arrest,
citation or charge.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 43
(d) At any time after an acquittal or a  dismissal other than a dismissal described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection, an arrested, cited or charged person may apply to the court in  the county in
which the person was arrested, cited or charged,  for entry of an order setting aside the record of
the arrest, citation or charge.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person whose sentence of  probation was
revoked may not apply to the court for entry of an order  setting aside the conviction for which the
person was sentenced to probation for a period of three years from the  date of revocation or until
the person becomes eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whichever occurs  later.
(f) A person filing a motion under this section is not required to pay the  filing fee established
under ORS 21.135.
(2)(a) A copy of the motion shall be served upon the office of  the prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted the offense, or who had authority to  prosecute the charge if there was no accusatory
instrument filed. The prosecuting attorney  may object to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of
this section and shall notify the court and the person of the objection within 120 days of  the date
the motion was filed with the court.
(b) When a prosecuting attorney is served with a copy of a motion to set  aside a conviction
under subsection (1)(a)  of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the motion
and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if  any, of the offense by mailing a copy of the motion
and notice to the victim’s last-known address.
(c) When a person makes a motion under this section, the person shall forward  to the Depart-
ment of  State Police a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in any other
manner specified by the department.
(d) When a person makes a  motion under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person must pay
a fee to the Department of State Police for the purpose of  the department performing a criminal
record check. The department  shall establish a fee in an amount not to exceed the actual cost of
performing the criminal record check. If the  department is required to perform only one criminal
record  check  for the person, the department may only charge one fee, regardless of the number of
counties in which the person is filing a motion to  set aside a conviction, arrest, charge or citation
under this section. The department shall provide a copy of the results of the criminal record  check
to the prosecuting attorney.
(e) The prosecuting attorney may not charge the person a fee for performing the requirements
described in this section.
(3)(a) If an objection is received to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
court shall hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may  require the taking
of such proofs as the court deems proper. The court shall  allow the victim to make a statement at
the hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for relief under this section,  the court shall grant the
motion and enter  an order as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection unless the court makes
written findings, by  clear and convincing evidence, that the circumstances and behavior of the per-
son, from  the date of the conviction the person is seeking to set aside to the date of the hearing
on the  motion, do not warrant granting the motion due to the circumstances and behavior creating
a risk to public safety. When determining whether the person’s circumstances and behavior  create
a risk to public safety, the court may only consider criminal behavior, or violations  of regulatory
law or administrative rule enforced by civil  penalty or other administrative sanction that relate to
the character of the conviction sought to  be set aside. The court may not consider nonpunitive civil
liability, monetary obligations and motor vehicle  violations. Upon granting the motion, the court
shall enter an appropriate order containing the original arrest or citation charge, the conviction
charge, if different from the original, the date  of charge, the submitting agency and the disposition
of the charge. Upon the entry of the order, the person for purposes of the law  shall be deemed not
to have been previously convicted, and  the court shall issue an order sealing the record of con-
viction and other official records in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge.
(b) The court shall grant a motion filed under subsection (1)(c) or (d)  of this section, or under
subsection (1)(a) of this section if no objection to the motion is  received, and shall enter an appro-
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 44
priate order containing the original arrest or citation charge, the conviction charge,  if applicable
and different from the original, the date of charge, the submitting agency  and the disposition of the
charge. Upon the entry of the order, the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed not to  have
been previously convicted, arrested, cited or charged, and the court shall issue an order sealing  all
official  records  in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge, whether or not the
arrest, citation or charge resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(4) The clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as directed
by the court. A certified copy must be sent to the Department of Corrections when the order con-
cerns a conviction. Upon entry of  the order, the conviction, arrest, citation, charge or other pro-
ceeding shall be  deemed not to have occurred, and the person may answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section apply to a conviction for:
(a) A Class B felony, except for  a violation of ORS 166.429 or any crime classified as a person
felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) Any misdemeanor, Class C felony or felony punishable as a misdemeanor  pursuant to ORS
161.705.
(c) An offense constituting a violation under state law or local ordinance.
(d) An offense committed before January 1, 1972, that, if committed after that date, would qualify
for an order under this section.
(e) The finding of a person in contempt of court.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of  this
section do not apply to a conviction for:
(a) Criminal  mistreatment in the second degree under ORS 163.200 if the victim at the time of
the crime was 65 years of age or older.
(b) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205 if the victim at  the time of the
crime was 65  years of age or older, or when the offense constitutes child abuse as defined in ORS
419B.005.
(c) Endangering the welfare of a minor under ORS  163.575 (1)(a), when the offense constitutes
child abuse as defined in ORS 419B.005.
(d) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS 163.145, when that  offense was punishable as a
Class C felony.
(e) Assault in the third degree under ORS 163.165 (1)(h).
(f) Any sex crime, unless:
(A) The sex crime is listed in ORS 163A.140 (1)(a) and:
(i) The person has been relieved of the  obligation to report as a sex offender pursuant to a court
order entered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150; and
(ii) The person has not  been convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the  juvenile court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; or
(B) The sex crime constitutes a Class C felony and:
(i) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
(ii) The person is:
(I) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(II) At least two years and 180 days older, but less  than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the court finds that setting aside the conviction  is in the interests of justice and of
benefit to the person and the community;
(iii) The  victim’s lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(iv) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
(v) The person has not been convicted of, found guilty except  for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the  juvenile court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; and
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 45
(vi) Each conviction or finding described in this subparagraph involved the same victim.
(7) Notwithstanding  subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section
do not apply to:
(a) A conviction for a state or municipal traffic offense.
(b) A  person convicted, within the following applicable time period immediately preceding the
filing of the motion pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, of any other offense,  excluding motor
vehicle violations  and unlawful possession of a controlled  substance constituting a drug
enforcement misdemeanor as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act , whether or not the  other
conviction is for conduct associated  with the same criminal episode that caused the arrest, citation,
charge or conviction that is sought to be set aside:
(A) For a motion concerning a Class B felony, seven years.
(B) For a motion concerning a Class C felony, five years.
(C) For a motion concerning a Class A misdemeanor, three years.
(D) For a motion concerning a Class B or Class C misdemeanor a violation or a finding of con-
tempt of court, one year.
(c) A single violation, other than a motor vehicle violation, within the time period specified  in
paragraph (b) of this subsection is not a conviction under this subsection. Notwithstanding  sub-
section (1) of this section, a  conviction that has been set aside under this section shall be considered
for the purpose of determining whether paragraph (b) of this subsection is applicable.
(d) A person who  at the time the motion authorized by subsection (1) of this section is pending
before the court is under charge of commission of any crime.
(8) The provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of  this section do not apply to an arrest or citation
for driving while under the influence of intoxicants if the charge is  dismissed as a result of the
person’s successful completion of a diversion agreement described in ORS 813.200.
(9) The provisions of subsection  (1) of this section apply to convictions, arrests, citations and
charges that occurred before, as well as those that occurred after, September 9,  1971. There is no
time limit for making an application.
(10) For purposes of any civil action in which truth is an  element of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section providing  that the conviction, arrest,
citation, charge or other proceeding be deemed not to have occurred do not apply and a  party may
apply to the court for an order requiring disclosure of the official records in the  case as may be
necessary in the interest of justice.
(11)(a) Upon motion of any prosecutor or  defendant in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit showing good cause, the court with jurisdiction  may order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records sealed under this section for  the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However,  such an order has no other effect on the orders setting
aside the conviction or the arrest, citation or charge record.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when  an arrest, citation or charge de-
scribed in subsection (1)(c) of this section is  set aside, a prosecuting attorney may, for the purpose
of initiating a criminal proceeding within the  statute of limitations, unseal the records sealed under
this section by notifying the court with jurisdiction over the  charge, record of arrest or citation.
The prosecuting attorney shall notify the  person who is the subject of the records of the unsealing
under this paragraph by sending written notification to the person’s last known address.
(12) The State  Court Administrator shall create forms to be used throughout the state for
motions and proposed orders described in this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
(b) “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
(Other Amendments Related to Expungement)
SECTION 56.
 ORS 135.050 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 46
135.050. (1) Suitable counsel for a defendant shall be appointed by a municipal,  county or justice
court if:
(a) The defendant is before a court on a matter described in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) The defendant requests aid of counsel;
(c) The defendant provides to the court a written and verified financial statement; and
(d) It  appears to the court that the defendant is financially unable to retain adequate represen-
tation without substantial hardship in providing basic economic  necessities to the defendant or the
defendant’s dependent family.
(2) Suitable counsel for a defendant shall be appointed by a circuit court if:
(a) The defendant is before the court on a matter described in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) The defendant requests aid of counsel;
(c) The defendant provides to the court a written and verified financial statement; and
(d)(A) The defendant is determined to  be financially eligible under ORS 151.485 and the stand-
ards established by the Oregon Public Defense Commission under ORS 151.216; or
(B) The court finds, on the record, substantial and compelling reasons why the defendant is fi-
nancially unable to retain adequate representation  without substantial hardship in providing basic
economic necessities to the defendant or the defendant’s dependent  family despite the fact that the
defendant does not meet the financial eligibility standards established by the commission.
(3) Appointed counsel may  not be denied to any defendant merely because the defendant’s
friends or relatives have resources adequate  to retain counsel or because the defendant has depos-
ited or is capable  of depositing security for release. However, appointed counsel may be denied to
a defendant if the defendant’s spouse has adequate resources which the court determines  should be
made available to retain counsel.
(4) The defendant’s financial statement under subsection (1) or (2) of this  section shall include,
but not be limited to:
(a) A list of bank  accounts in the name of defendant or defendant’s spouse, and the balance in
each;
(b) A list of defendant’s interests in real property and those of defendant’s spouse;
(c) A list  of automobiles and other personal property of significant value belonging to defendant
or defendant’s spouse;
(d) A list of debts in the name of defendant or defendant’s spouse, and the total of each; and
(e) A record of earnings and other sources of income in the  name of defendant or defendant’s
spouse, and the total of each.
(5) Counsel must be appointed for a defendant who  meets the requirements of subsection (1) or
(2) of this section and who is before a court on any of the following matters:
(a) Charged with a crime.
(b) For a hearing to determine whether an  enhanced sentence should be imposed when such
proceedings may result in the imposition of a felony sentence.
(c) For extradition proceedings under the provisions of the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act.
(d) For any proceeding concerning an order of  probation, including but not limited to the re-
voking or amending thereof.
(6) Unless otherwise ordered  by the court, the appointment of counsel under this section shall
continue during all  criminal proceedings resulting from the defendant’s arrest through acquittal or
the imposition of punishment. The court having jurisdiction of the case may not substitute one  ap-
pointed counsel for  another except pursuant to the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines
of the Oregon Public Defense Commission under ORS 151.216.
(7) If, at any time after the appointment of counsel,  the court having jurisdiction of the case
finds that the defendant is  financially able to obtain counsel, the court may terminate the appoint-
ment of counsel. If, at any time during criminal proceedings, the court having  jurisdiction of the
case finds that the defendant is financially unable to pay counsel whom  the defendant has retained,
the court may appoint counsel as provided in this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 47
(8)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the court may order the de-
fendant in a circuit court  to pay to the Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225,
through the clerk of the court, in full or in  part the administrative costs of determining the eligi-
bility of the defendant for appointed counsel  and the costs of the legal and other services that are
related to the provision of appointed counsel under ORS 151.487.
(b) A court may not enter an order described in paragraph (a) of this subsection when
the defendant is charged only  with unlawful possession of a controlled substance constituting
a drug enforcement misdemeanor as described in section 35 of this 2024 Act.
(9) In addition to any criminal prosecution, a civil proceeding  may be initiated by any public
body which has  expended moneys for the defendant’s legal assistance within two years of judgment
if the defendant was not qualified in accordance with subsection (1) or (2) of this section for  legal
assistance.
(10) The civil  proceeding shall be subject to the exemptions from execution as provided for by
law.
(11) As used in this  section unless the context requires otherwise, “counsel” includes a legal
advisor appointed under ORS 135.045.
(Repealing Class E Violation Provisions)
SECTION 57.  ORS 51.050 is amended to read:
51.050. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,  in addition to the criminal jurisdiction
of justice courts already conferred upon and exercised by them, justice  courts have jurisdiction of
all offenses committed or triable in their respective counties. The jurisdiction conveyed  by this
section is concurrent with any jurisdiction that may be exercised by a circuit  court or municipal
court.
(2) In any justice court that has not become a court of record  under ORS 51.025, a defendant
charged with a misdemeanor shall be notified immediately after entering a plea of not guilty of  the
right of the defendant to have  the matter transferred to the circuit court for the county where the
justice court is located. The election shall be made within 10 days after  the plea of not guilty is
entered, and the justice shall immediately transfer the case to the appropriate court.
(3) A justice court does  not have jurisdiction over the trial of any felony or a designated drug-
related misdemeanor as  defined in ORS 423.478. [ A justice court does not have jurisdiction over Class
E violations. ] Except as provided in ORS 51.037, a justice court does not have jurisdiction over of-
fenses created by the charter or ordinance of any city.
SECTION 58.  ORS 137.300 is amended to read:
137.300. (1) The Criminal Fine Account is established in the General  Fund. Except as otherwise
provided by law, all amounts collected in state courts as  monetary obligations in criminal actions
shall be deposited by the courts in the account. All moneys in  the account are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue to be distributed by  the Department of Revenue as provided
in this section. The Department of Revenue shall keep a record of moneys transferred  into and out
of the account.
(2) The Legislative  Assembly shall first allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the
following purposes, in the following order of priority:
(a) Allocations for public safety standards, training and facilities.
(b) Allocations for criminal injuries compensation and assistance to victims of crime and  chil-
dren reasonably suspected of being victims of crime.
(c) Allocations for the forensic services provided by the Oregon State Police, including,  but not
limited to, services of the Chief Medical Examiner.
(d) Allocations for the maintenance and operation of the Law Enforcement Data System.
(3) After making allocations under subsection (2) of this section, the Legislative Assembly shall
allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the following purposes:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 48
(a) Allocations to the Law  Enforcement Medical Liability Account established under ORS
414.815.
(b) Allocations to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established under  ORS 1.178.
(c) Allocations to the Department  of Corrections for the purpose of planning, operating and
maintaining county juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities and drug and  alcohol
programs.
(d) Allocations to the Oregon Health  Authority for the purpose of grants under ORS 430.345 for
the establishment, operation  and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early inter-
vention and treatment services provided through a county.
(e) Allocations to the Oregon State Police for the purpose of  the enforcement of the laws re-
lating to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(f) Allocations to the Arrest and Return Account established under ORS 133.865.
(g) Allocations to the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund established under ORS 813.270.
(h) Allocations to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012.
[(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Legislative  Assembly shall allocate
all moneys deposited into the Criminal Fine Account as  payment of fines on Class E violations to the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund established under ORS 430.384. ]
[(5)] (4)  It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that allocations from the Criminal Fine
Account under subsection (3) of this section be consistent with historical funding of the entities,
programs and accounts listed in subsection (3) of this section from monetary obligations  imposed in
criminal proceedings. Amounts that are  allocated under subsection (3)(c) of this section shall be
distributed to counties based  on the amounts that were transferred to counties by circuit courts
during the 2009-2011 biennium under the provisions of ORS 137.308, as in effect January 1, 2011.
[(6)] (5)  Moneys in the Criminal Fine Account may not be allocated for the payment of  debt
service obligations.
[(7)] (6)  The Department of Revenue shall deposit in the General Fund all moneys remaining in
the Criminal Fine Account after the distributions listed in subsections (2)[ ,] and (3) [ and (4)] of this
section have been made.
[(8)] (7) The Department of Revenue shall establish by  rule a process for distributing moneys in
the Criminal Fine Account.  The department may not distribute more than one-eighth of the total
biennial allocation to an entity during a calendar quarter.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 153.012 is amended to read:
153.012. Violations are classified for the purpose of sentencing into the following categories:
(1) Class A violations.
(2) Class B violations.
(3) Class C violations.
(4) Class D violations.
[(5) Class E violations. ]
[(6)] (5) Unclassified violations as described in ORS 153.015.
[(7)] (6) Specific fine violations as described in ORS 153.015.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 153.018 is amended to read:
153.018. (1) The penalty for  committing a violation is a fine. The law creating a violation may
impose other penalties in addition to a fine but may not impose a term of imprisonment.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the maximum fine  for a violation committed by an in-
dividual is:
(a) $2,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $1,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $500 for a Class C violation.
(d) $250 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $100 for a Class E violation. ]
[(f)] (e) $2,000 for a specific fine violation, or the maximum  amount otherwise established by law
for the specific fine violation.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 49
(3) If a special corporate fine is specified in the law creating the violation, the sentence to pay
a fine shall be governed by the law creating the violation.  Except as otherwise provided by law, if
a special corporate fine is not specified  in the law creating the violation, the maximum fine for a
violation committed by a corporation is:
(a) $4,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $2,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $1,000 for a Class C violation.
(d) $500 for a Class D violation.
SECTION 61.
 ORS 153.019 is amended to read:
153.019. (1) Except as provided in ORS 153.020, [ 153.062 and 430.391,] the presumptive fines for
violations are:
(a) $440 for a Class A violation.
(b) $265 for a Class B violation.
(c) $165 for a Class C violation.
(d) $115 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $100 for a Class E violation. ]
(2) The presumptive fine for a specific fine violation is:
(a) The amount specified by statute as the presumptive fine for the violation; or
(b) An amount equal  to the greater of 20 percent of the maximum fine prescribed for the vio-
lation, or the minimum fine prescribed by statute for the violation.
(3) Any  surcharge imposed under ORS 1.188 shall be added to and made a part of the
presumptive fine.
SECTION 62.
 ORS 153.021 is amended to read:
153.021. (1) Unless a specific minimum fine is prescribed for a violation,  and except as otherwise
provided by law,  the minimum fine a court shall impose for a violation that is subject to the
presumptive fines established by ORS 153.019 (1) or 153.020 are as follows:
(a) $225 for a Class A violation.
(b) $135 for a Class B violation.
(c) $85 for a Class C violation.
(d) $65 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $45 for a Class E violation. ]
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, a court may waive payment of the minimum
fine described  in this section, in whole or in part, if the court determines that requiring payment
of the minimum fine would be inconsistent with justice in  the case. In making its determination
under this subsection, the court shall consider:
(a) The financial resources of the defendant and the burden that payment of the minimum  fine
would impose, with due regard to the other obligations of the defendant; and
(b) The extent to which that burden could be alleviated by allowing the defendant to pay  the
fine in installments or subject to other conditions set by the court.
(3) This section does not affect the manner in which a court imposes or reduces  monetary obli-
gations other than fines.
(4) The  Department of Revenue or Secretary of State may audit any court to determine whether
the court is complying with the  requirements of this section. In addition, the Department of Revenue
or Secretary of State may audit any court to determine  whether the court is complying with the
requirements of ORS 137.145 to 137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680. The Department  of Revenue or Sec-
retary of State may file an action under ORS 34.105 to 34.240 to enforce the  requirements of this
section and of ORS 137.145 to 137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680.
SECTION 63.
 ORS 153.064 is amended to read:
153.064. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a warrant for arrest may be  is-
sued against a person  who fails to make a first appearance on a citation for a violation, or fails to
appear at any other subsequent time set  for trial or other appearance, only if the person is charged
with failure to appear in a violation proceeding under ORS 153.992.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 50
(2) If a person fails to make a first appearance on a citation for a violation  [ other than a Class
E violation ], or fails to appear at any other subsequent time set  for trial or other appearance on a
violation [ other than a Class E violation ], the  court may issue an order that requires the defendant
to appear and show cause why the defendant should not be held  in contempt. The show cause order
may be mailed to the defendant  by certified mail, return receipt requested. If service cannot be ac-
complished by mail, the defendant must be personally served. If the defendant is served  and fails to
appear at the time specified in the show cause  order, the court may issue an arrest warrant for the
defendant for the purpose of bringing the defendant before the court.
SECTION 64.  ORS 153.992 is amended to read:
153.992. (1)  A person commits the offense of failure to appear in a violation proceeding if the
person has been served with a citation issued under this chapter for a violation [ other than  a Class
E violation ] and the person knowingly fails to do any of the following:
(a) Make a first appearance in the manner required by ORS 153.061 within the time allowed.
(b) Make appearance at the time set for trial in the violation proceeding.
(c) Appear at any other time required by the court or by law.
(2) Failure to appear on a violation citation is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 65.
 ORS 221.339 is amended to read:
221.339. (1) A municipal court has concurrent jurisdiction with circuit  courts and justice courts
over all violations committed or triable in the city where the court is located.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, municipal courts have concur-
rent jurisdiction with circuit courts  and justice courts over misdemeanors committed or triable in
the city.  Municipal courts may exercise the jurisdiction conveyed by this section without a charter
provision or ordinance authorizing that exercise.
(3) Municipal courts have no jurisdiction over felonies[ ,] or  designated drug-related
misdemeanors as defined in ORS 423.478 [ or Class E violations ].
(4) A city may limit the exercise  of jurisdiction over misdemeanors by a municipal court under
this section by the adoption of a charter provision or ordinance, except that municipal courts  must
retain concurrent jurisdiction with circuit courts over:
(a) Misdemeanors created by the city’s own charter or by  ordinances adopted by the city, as
provided in ORS 3.132; and
(b) Traffic crimes as defined by ORS 801.545.
(5) Subject to the powers and duties of the Attorney General under  ORS 180.060, the city at-
torney has authority to prosecute a violation of any offense created by statute that is subject to  the
jurisdiction of a municipal court, including  any appeal, if the offense is committed or triable in the
city. The prosecution shall be in the name of the state. The city attorney shall have all powers of
a district attorney in prosecutions under this subsection.
SECTION 65a.
 ORS 316.502 is amended to read:
316.502. (1) The net revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter,  after deducting refunds and
amounts described in ORS 285B.630[ ,] and 285C.635 [ and 305.231], shall  be paid over to the State
Treasurer  and  held in the General Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet any
expense or obligation of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(2) A working balance of unreceipted revenue from the  tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance shall not at the close  of any fiscal year
exceed the sum of $1 million.
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The  refund payments in excess of tax liability authorized under ORS 315.133, 315.174, 315.262,
315.264, 315.266, 315.273, 315.519 and 316.090 and section 3, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 66.
 ORS 419C.370 is amended to read:
419C.370. (1) The juvenile court may enter an order directing that all cases involving:
(a) Violation of a  law or ordinance relating to the use or operation of a motor vehicle, boating
laws or game laws be waived to criminal or municipal court;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 51
(b) An offense classified as a violation [ other than a Class E violation ] under the laws of this
state or a political subdivision of this state be waived  to municipal court if the municipal court has
agreed to accept jurisdiction; and
(c) A  misdemeanor that entails theft, destruction, tampering with or vandalism of property be
waived to municipal court if the municipal court has agreed to accept jurisdiction.
(2) Cases waived under subsection (1) of this section are subject to the following:
(a) That the criminal or municipal court prior to hearing a case,  other than a case involving a
parking violation, in which the defendant is or appears to be under 18 years of  age notify the ju-
venile court of that fact; and
(b) That the juvenile court may  direct that any such case be waived to the juvenile court for
further proceedings.
(3)(a) When a person who has been waived under subsection (1)(c) of  this section is convicted
of a property offense, the municipal court  may impose any sanction authorized for the offense except
for incarceration. The municipal court shall notify the juvenile court of the disposition of the case.
(b) When a person has been waived under subsection (1) of this  section and fails to appear as
summoned or is placed on probation and is alleged to have  violated a condition of the probation, the
juvenile court may recall the case to the juvenile court for  further proceedings. When a person has
been returned to juvenile court under this  paragraph, the juvenile court may proceed as though the
person had failed to appear as summoned to the juvenile court or had  violated a juvenile court
probation order under ORS 419C.446.
(4) Records of cases waived under subsection (1)(c)  of this section are juvenile records for pur-
poses of expunction under ORS 419A.260 to 419A.271.
SECTION 67.
 ORS 430.384 is amended to read:
430.384. (1) The Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Drug Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
[(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant to ORS 305.231; ]
[(b)] (a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by  the Legislative Assembly;
[(c)] (b) Moneys allocated from the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to  ORS 475C.726 (3)(b);
and
[(d) Moneys allocated from the Criminal Fine Account pursuant to ORS 137.300 (4); and ]
[(e)] (c) All other moneys deposited into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund  shall be continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for
the purposes set forth in ORS 430.389.
(4)(a) Pursuant to subsection [ (2)(b)] (2)(a) of this section,  the Legislative Assembly shall ap-
propriate or transfer to the fund  an amount sufficient to fully fund the grants program required by
ORS 430.389.
(b) The total amount deposited  and transferred into the fund shall not be less than $57 million
for the first year ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 are in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, the minimum transfer amount  set forth in paragraph (b) of this
subsection shall be increased by not less than the sum of:
(A) $57 million multiplied by  the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending  August 31 of the prior calen-
dar year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the calendar year 2020; and
(B) The annual increase, if any, in moneys distributed pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b).
SECTION 68.
 ORS 430.389 is amended to read:
430.389. (1) The Oversight and  Accountability Council shall approve grants and funding provided
by the Oregon  Health Authority in accordance with this section to implement Behavioral Health
Resource Networks and increase access to community care. A Behavioral Health Resource  Network
is an entity or collection of entities that individually or jointly provide some or  all of the services
described in subsection (2)(e) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 52
(2)(a) The authority shall establish an equitable:
(A) Process for applying for grants and funding by  agencies or organizations, whether govern-
ment or community based, to establish  Behavioral Health Resource Networks for the purposes of
immediately screening the  acute needs of individuals with substance use, including those who also
have a mental illness, and assessing and addressing any ongoing needs through ongoing  case man-
agement, harm reduction, treatment, housing and linkage to other care and services.
(B) Evaluation process to  assess the effectiveness of Behavioral Health Resource Networks that
receive grants or funding.
(b) Recipients of grants or funding must be licensed, certified or  credentialed by the state, in-
cluding certification  under ORS 743A.168 (9), or meet criteria prescribed by rule by the authority
under ORS  430.390. A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant
or funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(c) The council and the authority shall ensure that  residents of each county have access to all
of the services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(d) Applicants for grants  and funding may apply individually or jointly with other network par-
ticipants to provide services in one or more counties.
(e) A network must have the capacity  to provide the following services and any other services
specified by the authority by rule  but no individual participant in a network is required to provide
all of the services:
(A) Screening by  certified addiction peer support or wellness specialists or other qualified per-
sons designated  by the council to determine a client’s need for immediate medical or other treatment
to determine what acute care is needed and  where it can be best provided, identify other needs and
link the client to  other appropriate local or statewide services, including treatment for substance
use and coexisting health problems, housing, employment, training and child  care. Networks shall
provide this service 24 hours  a day, seven days a week, every calendar day of the year through a
telephone line or other means. Networks may  rely on the statewide telephone hotline established
by the authority under ORS 430.391 for telephone screenings during nonbusiness hours such  as
evenings, weekends and holidays. Notwithstanding paragraph  (c) of this subsection, only one
grantee in each  network within each county is required to provide the screenings described in this
subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health needs  assessment, including a substance use screening by
a certified alcohol and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment  professional. The
assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual  intervention planning, case management and connection to services. If, after the
completion of a screening, a client indicates a desire to address some or all of the identified needs,
a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan  must
address the client’s need for substance use treatment, coexisting health problems,  housing, employ-
ment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing  peer counseling and support from screening and assessment through implementation
of individual intervention plans as well as peer  outreach workers to engage directly with
marginalized community members who could potentially benefit from the network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction services and information and education about harm reduction services.
(G) Low-barrier substance use treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use.
(f) If an applicant for a grant or funding under this subsection is unable to provide  all of the
services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection, the applicant may identify how  the applicant
intends to partner with other entities to provide the services,  and the authority and the council may
facilitate collaboration among applicants.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 53
(g) All services provided through the networks  must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed,
culturally specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental. The goal shall be
to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other social determinants of health.
(h) The networks must be  adequately staffed to address the needs of people with substance use
within their regions  as prescribed by the authority by rule, including, at a minimum, at least one
person in each of the following categories:
(A) Alcohol and drug counselor certified by the authority or other credentialed addiction treat-
ment professional;
(B) Case manager;
(C) Addiction peer support specialist certified by the authority;
(D) Addiction peer wellness specialist certified by the authority;
(E) Recovery mentor, certified by the Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board  of
Oregon or its successor organization; and
(F) Youth support specialist certified by the authority.
(i) Verification of a screening by a certified addiction peer  support specialist, wellness specialist
or other person in accordance with paragraph (e)(A) of  this subsection shall promptly be provided
to the  client by the entity conducting the screening. If the client executes a valid release of infor-
mation, the entity shall provide verification of the screening to  the authority or a contractor of the
authority and the authority or the authority’s contractor shall forward the verification to [ the court,
in the manner prescribed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, to satisfy the conditions for  dis-
missal under ORS 153.062 or 475.237 ] any entity the client has authorized to receive the  ver-
ification.
(3)(a) If moneys remain in the Drug  Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after the council
has committed grants and  funding to establish behavioral health resource networks serving every
county in this state, the council shall  authorize grants and funding to other agencies or organiza-
tions, whether government  or community based, and to the nine federally recognized tribes in this
state and service providers that are affiliated with the nine federally recognized tribes  in this state
to increase access to one or more of the following:
(A) Low-barrier substance use treatment  that is evidence-informed, trauma-informed, culturally
specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental;
(B) Peer support and recovery services;
(C) Transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with substance use;
(D) Harm reduction interventions including, but  not limited to, overdose prevention education,
access to short-acting opioid antagonists, as defined  in ORS 689.800, and sterile syringes and
stimulant-specific drug education and outreach; or
(E) Incentives and supports  to expand the behavioral health workforce to support the services
delivered by behavioral health resource networks  and entities receiving grants or funding under this
subsection.
(b) A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant or funding  to
supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(4) In awarding grants and  funding under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the council
shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available regional data related to the  substance use treatment needs and the access
to culturally specific and linguistically responsive services in communities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of  residents of this state for services, supports and treatment at all ages.
(5) The council shall  require any government entity that applies for a grant to specify in the
application details regarding subgrantees and how the government entity will  fund culturally spe-
cific  organizations  and culturally specific services. A government entity receiving a grant must
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 54
make an explicit commitment not to supplant or decrease any existing  funding used to provide ser-
vices funded by the grant.
(6) In determining grants and funding to be  awarded, the council may consult the comprehensive
addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan established by  the Alcohol and Drug Policy
Commission under ORS 430.223 and the advice  of any other group, agency, organization or individ-
ual that desires to provide advice to the council that is consistent with the terms of this section.
(7) Services provided by grantees, including services provided by a Behavioral Health  Resource
Network,  shall  be free of charge to the clients receiving the services. Grantees in each network
shall seek reimbursement from  insurance issuers, the medical assistance program or any other third
party responsible for the cost of services provided  to a client and grants and funding provided by
the council or the authority under  this section may be used for copayments, deductibles or other
out-of-pocket costs incurred by the client for the services.
(8) Subsection (7) of this  section does not require the medical assistance program to reimburse
the cost of services for which another third  party is responsible in violation of 42 U.S.C. 1396a(25).
SECTION 69.  ORS 430.392 is amended to read:
430.392. (1) The Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State  shall conduct per-
formance audits and financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of the  Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the  effectiveness of the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund and  the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or funds under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that  are subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
(2) The division shall monitor and  report on the progress in implementing any recommendations
made in the audit or financial  review. The division shall follow up on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or as an activity separate from other audit activity. When  following up on
recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency  evidence of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth in this section shall be conducted pursuant  to the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent any  provision of ORS chapter 297 conflicts with any provision of
ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and ] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, in  which case the provisions of ORS
[293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall control.
(4) No later than December 31, 2023, the division shall perform a:
(a) Real-time audit, as prescribed by the division, which shall include  an assessment of the re-
lationship between the Oversight and Accountability Council and the Oregon Health  Authority, the
relationship between the council and recipients  of grants or funding and the structural integrity of
ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and ] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, including but not limited to assessing:
(A) Whether the organizational structure of the council contains conflicts or problems.
(B) Whether the rules adopted by the council are clear and functioning properly.
(C) Whether the council  has sufficient authority and independence to achieve the council’s
mission.
(D) Whether the  authority is fulfilling the authority’s duties under ORS 430.384, 430.387, 430.390
and 430.391.
(E) Whether there are conflicts of interest in the process of awarding grants or funding.
(F) Whether there are opportunities to expand collaboration between  the council and state
agencies.
(G) Whether barriers exist in data collection and evaluation mechanisms.
(H) Who is providing the data.
(I) Other areas identified by the division.
(b) Financial review, which shall include an assessment of the following:
(A) Whether grants and funding are going to organizations that are culturally responsive  and
linguistically specific, including an assessment of:
(i) The barriers  that exist for grant and funding applicants who are Black, Indigenous or People
of Color.
(ii) The applicants that were denied and why.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 55
(iii) Whether grants and other funding are being disbursed  based on the priorities specified in
ORS 430.389.
(iv) For government entities receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389, the  government
entities’ subgrantees and whether the governmental entity supplanted or decreased any local funding
dedicated to the same services after receiving grants or funds under ORS 430.389.
(v) What proportion of grants or funds received by  grantees and others under ORS 430.389, was
devoted to administrative costs.
(B) The organizations and agencies receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389 and:
(i) Which of the organizations and agencies are Behavioral Health Resource Network entities.
(ii) The amount each organization and agency received.
(iii) The total number of organizations and agencies that applied for grants or funding.
(iv) The amount of moneys from the fund that were used to administer the  programs selected
by the council.
(v) The moneys that remained in the  Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after grants
and funding were disbursed.
(5) No later than December 31, 2025, the division shall conduct  a performance audit, which must
include an assessment of the following:
(a) All relevant data regarding  the implementation of ORS [ 153.062 and] 430.391, including de-
mographic information on individuals  who receive citations [ subject to ORS 153.062 and 430.391 ] for
a drug enforcement misdemeanor described in  section 35 of this 2024 Act  and whether the ci-
tations resulted in connecting the individuals with treatment.
(b) The functioning of:
(A) Law enforcement and the courts in relation to [ Class E violation  citations ] drug enforce-
ment misdemeanors described in section 35 of this 2024 Act ;
(B) The telephone hotline operated by the authority;
(C) Entities providing verification of screenings under ORS 430.389; and
(D) The  grants and funding systems between the council, the authority and recipients of grants
or funding, including by gathering information about which entities are receiving grants or  funding
and what  the grants or funding are used for, the process of applying for grants or funding and
whether the process  is conducive to obtaining qualified applicants for grants or funding who are
from communities of color.
(c) Disparities  shown by demographic data and whether the citation data reveals a dispropor-
tionate use of citations in communities most impacted by the war on drugs.
(d) Whether ORS  [ 153.062,] 430.389 and 430.391 reduce the involvement in the criminal justice
system of individuals with substance use.
(e) Training opportunities provided to law enforcement officials regarding  services that are
available and how to connect individuals to the services.
(f) The efficacy of issuing citations as a method of connecting individuals to services.
(g) The role  of the implementation of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 in reducing overdose
rates.
(h) Outcomes for individuals receiving treatment and other  social services under ORS 430.389,
including, but not limited to, the following:
(A) Whether access  to care increased since December 3, 2020, and, if data is available, whether,
since December 3, 2020:
(i) The number of drug and alcohol treatment service providers increased.
(ii) The number of culturally specific providers increased.
(iii) Access to harm reduction services has increased.
(iv) More individuals are accessing treatment than they were before December 3, 2020.
(v) Access to housing for individuals with substance use has increased.
(B) Data on Behavioral Health Resource Networks and recipients of  grants and funding under
ORS 430.389, including:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 56
(i) The outcomes of each network or recipient, including  but not limited to the number of clients
with substance use receiving services from each network or  recipient, the average duration of client
participation and client outcomes.
(ii) The  number of individuals seeking assistance from the network or recipients who are denied
or not connected to substance use treatment and other services, and the reasons for the denials.
(iii) The average time it takes for clients to access services and fulfill their individual inter-
vention plan and the reason for any delays, such as waiting lists at referred services.
(iv) Whether average times to access services to which clients are referred, such as housing or
medically assisted treatment, have decreased over time since December 3, 2020.
(v) Demographic data on clients served by Behavioral Health Resource Networks, including
self-reported demographic data on race, ethnicity, gender and age.
(i) Each recipient of a grant or funding.
(j) Other areas identified by the division for ascertaining best practices for overdose  prevention.
(6) The division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant to  the
division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 69a.
 ORS 430.392, as amended by section 11, chapter 248, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
430.392. (1) The Division  of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State shall conduct per-
formance  audits  and financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of the Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness of  the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund and the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or  funds under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that  are subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
(2) The division shall monitor and  report on the progress in implementing any recommendations
made in the audit or financial review. The division shall follow up  on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or  as an activity separate from other audit activity. When following up on
recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency  evidence of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth in  this section shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent any provision of ORS chapter  297 conflicts with any provision of
ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to  430.390 and 430.394, in which case the provisions of ORS
[293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall control.
(4) The division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant to  the
division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 70.  ORS 475.235 is amended to read:
475.235. (1)  It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception in ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980 in any complaint,  information, indictment or other pleading
or in any trial, hearing or other proceeding under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.
(2) In the absence of proof that a person is the duly authorized  holder of an appropriate regis-
tration or order form issued  under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, the person is
presumed not  to be the holder of the registration or form. The burden of proof is upon the person
to rebut the presumption.
(3)(a) When a controlled substance is at issue in a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, at
a preliminary hearing, in a proceeding  on a district attorney’s information[ , during a proceeding on
a Class E violation ] or for purposes of an early disposition program, it is prima facie  evidence of the
identity of the controlled substance if:
(A) A sample of the controlled substance is tested using a presumptive test for controlled sub-
stances;
(B) The test is conducted by a law enforcement officer trained to use  the test or by a forensic
scientist; and
(C) The test is positive for the particular controlled substance.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 57
(b) When the identity of a controlled substance is  established using a presumptive test for pur-
poses of a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, a preliminary hearing,  a proceeding on a district
attorney’s information or an early disposition program, the defendant, upon notice to the  district
attorney, may request that the  controlled substance be sent to a state police forensic laboratory for
analysis. [ The defendant may not make a request under this paragraph concerning a controlled sub-
stance at issue in a proceeding on a Class E violation. ]
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, in all prosecutions in which an analysis of a
controlled substance or  sample was conducted, a certified copy of the analytical report signed by
the director of a state police forensic laboratory or the analyst or forensic scientist conducting  the
analysis shall be admitted as prima facie evidence of the results of  the analytical findings unless the
defendant has provided notice of an objection in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(5) If the defendant intends to object at  trial to the admission of a certified copy of an analytical
report as provided in subsection (4) of this section, not less than 15 days  prior to trial the defendant
shall file written notice of the objection with the court and serve a copy on the district attorney.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Analyst” means a person employed by the Department of State Police to  conduct analysis
in forensic laboratories established by the department under ORS 181A.150.
(b) “Presumptive test” includes,  but is not limited to, chemical tests using Marquis reagent,
Duquenois-Levine reagent, Scott reagent system or modified Chen’s reagent.
SECTION 71.
 ORS 670.280 is amended to read:
670.280. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “License” includes a registration, certification or permit.
(b) “Licensee” includes a registrant or a holder of a certification or permit.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 342.143  (3) or 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or agency
may not deny, suspend or revoke an occupational  or professional license solely for the reason that
the applicant  or licensee has been convicted of a crime, but it may consider the relationship of the
facts which support the conviction  and all intervening circumstances to the specific occupational
or professional standards in  determining the fitness of the person to receive or hold the license.
[There is a rebuttable presumption as to  each individual applicant or licensee that an existing or prior
conviction for conduct that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation does  not make an
applicant for an occupational or professional license  or a licensee with an occupational or professional
license unfit to receive or hold the license. ]
(3) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3) and  342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or
agency may deny an occupational or professional license or impose discipline on a licensee  based
on conduct that is not undertaken directly in the course of the licensed activity,  but that is sub-
stantially related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to  engage in the activity for
which the  license is required. In determining whether the conduct is substantially related to the
fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage in the activity for which the license  is re-
quired, the licensing board, commission  or agency shall consider the relationship of the facts with
respect to the conduct and all intervening circumstances  to the specific occupational or professional
standards. [ There is a  rebuttable presumption as to each individual applicant or licensee that an ex-
isting or prior conviction for conduct that has  been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation is
not related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee  to engage in the activity for which the
license is required. ]
SECTION 72.
ORS 153.043, 153.062, 293.665, 305.231, 419C.460 and 475.237 are repealed.
(Operative Dates and Applicability)
SECTION 73. (1) Sections 34 to 37, 51, 52 and 54 this 2024  Act, the amendments to ORS
51.050, 133.060, 135.050, 135.753, 137.225, 137.300, 153.012, 153.018, 153.019, 153.021,  153.064,
153.992, 221.339, 316.502, 419C.370, 423.478, 423.483, 423.525, 430.384, 430.389, 430.392,  475.235,
475.752, 475.814, 475.824, 475.834, 475.854, 475.874, 475.884, 475.894 and 670.280 by sections 38 to
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 58
50 and 55 to 71  of this 2024 Act and the repeal of ORS 153.043, 153.062, 293.665, 305.231,
419C.460 and 475.237 by section 72 of this 2024 Act become operative on September 1, 2024.
(2) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, the Judicial  Department, the Department
of Corrections, law enforcement agencies and  district attorneys may take any action before
the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is necessary for those en-
tities to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,
all of  the powers, duties and functions imposed on the entities under sections 34 to 37, 51,
52 and 54 this 2024 Act, the amendments to ORS 51.050, 133.060, 135.050, 135.753,  137.225,
137.300, 153.012,  153.018, 153.019, 153.021, 153.064, 153.992, 221.339, 316.502, 419C.370, 423.478,
423.483, 423.525, 430.384, 430.389, 430.392, 475.235, 475.752, 475.814,  475.824, 475.834, 475.854,
475.874, 475.884, 475.894 and 670.280 by sections 38 to 50 and 55 to 71 of this 2024 Act and the
repeal of ORS 153.043, 153.062, 293.665, 305.231, 419C.460 and 475.237 by section 72 of this  2024
Act.
SECTION 74.
Sections 35, 52 and 54 this 2024  Act, the amendments to ORS 51.050, 135.050,
135.753, 137.300,  153.012, 153.018, 153.019, 153.021, 153.064, 153.992, 221.339, 316.502, 419C.370,
423.478, 423.483, 423.525, 430.384, 430.389, 430.392, 475.235, 475.752,  475.814, 475.824, 475.834,
475.854, 475.874, 475.884, 475.894 and 670.280 by sections  39 to 50 and 56 to 71 of this 2024 Act
and the repeal of ORS 153.043, 153.062, 293.665, 305.231, 419C.460 and 475.237 by  section 72 of
this 2024 Act apply to conduct constituting an offense  occurring, or alleged to have occurred,
on or after September 1, 2024.
DATA TRACKING
SECTION 75. (1) For purposes of tracking racial or other demographic  disparities in
enforcement, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall collect and analyze the following
data concerning  deflections, arrests, charges and convictions for unlawful possession of a
controlled substance and delivery of a controlled substance offenses:
(a) The date and location of each deflection and arrest;
(b) The specific offense for which each person was arrested, charged or convicted; and
(c) Demographic data for each person deflected, arrested, charged or convicted.
(2) Beginning no later than August 31, 2025,  and annually thereafter, the commission
shall provide a report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the
judiciary, in the manner described in  ORS 192.245, containing an analysis of the data de-
scribed in this section.
(3) In carrying out the commission’s duties under  this section, the commission may use
any information concerning deflections obtained as part of carrying out the duties of  the
commission under section 37 of this 2024 Act  or as part of the grant program application,
monitoring and evaluation process described in sections 76 and 77 of this 2024 Act.
(4) Data  reported under this section shall be used only for statistical purposes and not
for any other purpose. The data reports  may not contain information that reveals the iden-
tity of  any individual. Data collected by government agencies or held by the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission under this section that may reveal  the identity of any individual is ex-
empt from public disclosure in any manner.
(5) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions
of this section.
OREGON BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DEFLECTION PROGRAM
SECTION 76.
(1) As used in this section, “deflection program”  means a collaborative
program between law enforcement agencies and behavioral health entities that assists indi-
viduals who may have substance  use disorder, another behavioral health disorder or co-
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 59
occurring disorders, to create community-based pathways to  treatment, recovery support
services, housing, case management or other services.
(2) The Oregon  Behavioral Health Deflection Program is established within the Improving
People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Grant Review  Com-
mittee established under ORS 430.234. The program consists of grants awarded by the com-
mittee to counties and federally recognized tribal governments to fund deflection programs.
(3)(a) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
(A) Address the need for more deflection programs to assist individuals  whose behavioral
health conditions, including substance use disorder, lead  to interactions with law enforce-
ment, incarceration, conviction and other engagement with the criminal justice system.
(B) Track and report data concerning deflection program  outcomes in order to determine
the best practices for deflection programs within this state.
(b) ORS 430.230 to 430.236 do not apply to the program described in this section.
(4)(a) The committee  shall develop a grant application process for awarding grants under
this section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by  a county or the
designee of a county, or by a tribal government or designee of a tribal government. Only one
application per county may be submitted, but the application may  request funding multiple
programs within a county.
(c) Prior to  submitting an application for a grant under this section, the applicant shall
coordinate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection
program to ensure that the partners have  the resources necessary to implement the de-
flection program. The partners shall include at least a district attorney, a law  enforcement
agency, a community mental health program established under ORS 430.620 and a  provider
from a Behavioral Health Resource Network established under ORS 430.389. Partners  may
also include a treatment provider, a local mental health authority, a tribal government, a
peer support organization, a court or a local government body.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of the coordination with  program partners required by paragraph (c)
of this subsection that has occurred;
(B) A description of the individuals who would be  eligible for the program and what
qualifies as a successful outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners de-
scribed in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(C) A description of how the program for  which the applicant is seeking funding is cul-
turally and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and evidence-based;
(D) A  description of a plan to address language access barriers when communicating
program referral options and program procedures to non-English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of how the program coordinator will  communicate with program part-
ners concerning persons participating in the program and any other matter necessary  for
the administration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with a community mental  health program,
a local mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking and reporting  data required by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
under section 37 of this 2024 Act;
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 60
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual or entity deemed necessary  by the program coordinator to carry
out the purposes  of the deflection program, including individuals with lived experience with
substance use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
(6) During a grant  application period established by the committee, the maximum pro-
portion of grant funds available to an applicant shall be determined as follows:
(a) The proportion of grant funds available to an applicant other  than a tribal govern-
ment shall be determined based on the county  formula share employed by the Oversight and
Accountability Council established under ORS 430.388, but an  applicant may not receive less
than $150,000.
(b) The committee shall determine the proportion of funds available to an applicant that
is a federally recognized tribal government.
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection program expenses including but not  limited to law enforcement employees,
deputy district attorneys and behavioral health  treatment workers, including peer navigators
and mobile crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the committee may award planning
grants for the development of deflection programs.
(c) The committee may allocate up to three percent of program funds to support grantee
data collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures.
(8) The Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission shall provide staff support to the grant
program.
(9) The committee and the  commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 77.
(1)(a) The Improving People’s Access  to Community-based Treatment,
Supports and Services Grant Review Committee established under  ORS 430.234, in cooper-
ation with the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission and  the Oregon Health Authority, shall
monitor the progress of and evaluate program outcomes for  applicants that receive grant
funds as part of the Oregon Behavioral  Health Deflection Program established under section
76 of this 2024 Act.
(b) The committee shall share with the commission any data described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection that the commission requires to carry  out the commission’s duties under
section 37 of this 2024 Act.
(2) Beginning no later than September 30, 2025,  the committee shall annually report, in
the manner described in ORS 192.245 and  in conjunction with the report required under ORS
430.245 (3), the findings of  the evaluation described in subsection (1) of this section to the
relevant interim committees of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 78. The Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Program Account is established
in the State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. All moneys in the ac-
count are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 76 and 77 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 79.  ORS 430.234 is amended to read:
430.234. (1)  The Improving People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Ser-
vices Grant Review Committee is established  in the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission consisting
of [ 19] 21 members as follows:
(a) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority, or the director’s designee.
(b) The Director of the Department of Corrections, or the director’s designee.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 61
(c) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, or the Chief Justice’s designee.
(d) The executive director  of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission or the director’s designee.
(e) Two members of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, to be appointed by the
chair of the commission.
[(e)] (f)  The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department or  the director’s
designee.
[(f)] (g)  Nine members appointed by the Governor including:
(A) A district attorney.
(B) An attorney specializing in  defense of individuals with mental health or substance use dis-
orders.
(C) A chief of police.
(D) A county commissioner.
(E) A director of a hospital that provides acute mental health treatment.
(F) A representative of a community-based mental health treatment facility  or a practitioner in
a community-based mental health treatment facility.
(G) A representative of a community-based substance use disorder treatment  facility or a prac-
titioner in a community-based substance use disorder treatment facility.
(H) A sheriff.
(I) A representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe.
[(g)] (h)  One nonvoting member appointed by the President  of the Senate from among members
of the Senate.
[(h)] (i)  One nonvoting member appointed by  the Speaker of the House of Representatives from
among members of the House of Representatives.
[(i)] (j)  Three members of the public  that represent the age demographics of the target popu-
lation.
(2) A majority of the voting members of  the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(3) The directors of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission and the Oregon Health Authority
or their designees shall serve as cochairpersons.
(4) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment to
become effective immediately.
(5) The committee shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the cochairpersons or
a majority of the voting members of the committee.
(6) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall provide staff support to the committee.
(7) Legislative members of  the committee shall be entitled to payment of compensation and ex-
penses under ORS 171.072, payable from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly.
(8) Members of the committee who are not members of  the Legislative Assembly are not entitled
to compensation but may be reimbursed for actual and  necessary travel and other expenses incurred
by the member in the performance of the member’s official duties in the manner and amount pro-
vided in ORS 292.495.
(9) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are  directed to assist the com-
mittee in the performance of the duties of the committee and, to the  extent permitted by laws re-
lating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice that the members  of the committee
consider necessary to perform their duties.
EXPANSION OF WELFARE HOLDS
SECTION 80.
 ORS 430.399 is amended to read:
430.399. (1) Any person who is intoxicated or under the  influence of controlled substances in a
public place may be sent home or taken to a sobering facility or to [ a treatment ] an  appropriate
facility by a police officer  or a member of a  mobile crisis intervention team as defined in ORS
430.626. If the person is incapacitated,  the person shall be taken by the police officer  or team
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 62
member to an appropriate [ treatment] facility or sobering facility. If  the health of the person ap-
pears to be in immediate  danger, or the police officer  or team member  has reasonable cause to
believe the person  is dangerous to self or to any other person, the person shall be taken by the
police officer  or team member  to an appropriate  [ treatment] facility or sobering facility. A person
shall be deemed incapacitated when in the opinion  of the police officer  or team member  the person
is unable to make a rational decision as to acceptance of assistance.
(2) When  a person is taken to [a treatment] an appropriate facility, the director of the
[treatment] facility shall determine whether the person shall be admitted as  a patient, referred to
another [ treatment] facility or a sobering  facility or denied referral or admission. If the person is
incapacitated or the health of the person appears  to be in immediate danger, or if the director has
reasonable cause to believe the person is dangerous to self or  to any other person, the person must
be admitted. The person shall  be discharged within [ 48] 72 hours unless the person has applied for
voluntary admission to the [ treatment] facility.
(3) When a person is taken to  a sobering facility, the staff of the sobering facility shall, con-
sistent with the facility’s comprehensive written policies and procedures,  determine whether or not
the person shall be admitted into the sobering facility. A person  who is admitted shall be discharged
from the sobering facility within 24 hours.
(4) In the absence of any appropriate [ treatment] facility or sobering facility, or  if a sobering
facility determines that a person should not be admitted to the  sobering facility, an intoxicated
person or a person under  the influence of controlled substances who would otherwise be taken by
[the] a police officer to [ a treatment] an appropriate facility or  sobering facility may be taken to the
city  or  county jail where the person may be held until no longer intoxicated, under the influence
of controlled substances or incapacitated.
(5) An intoxicated person or person  under the influence of controlled substances, when taken
into custody by the police officer for a criminal offense, shall immediately be taken to the  nearest
appropriate [ treatment] facility when the condition of the person requires emergency medical  treat-
ment.
(6) The records of a person at [ a treatment] an appropriate facility or sobering facility may  not,
without the person’s consent, be revealed to any person other than the director  and staff of the
[treatment] facility or sobering facility. A person’s request that no disclosure be made of  admission
to a [ treatment] facility  or sobering facility shall be honored unless the person is incapacitated or
disclosure of admission is required by ORS 430.397.
SECTION 80a.  ORS 430.401 is amended to read:
430.401. [(1)] A police officer,  person acting under the authority of a mobile crisis  inter-
vention team as defined  in ORS 430.626,  physician, naturopathic physician, physician assistant,
nurse practitioner, judge, treatment facility, treatment facility staff  member or sobering facility [ that
is registered with the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 430.262 based on a  written request for
registration received by the authority before January 1,  2016], or the staff of the sobering facility, may
not be held criminally  or civilly liable for actions pursuant to ORS 430.315, 430.335, 430.397 to
430.401 and 430.402 provided the actions are in good faith, on probable cause and without malice.
[(2) A sobering facility registered with the authority under  ORS 430.262 based on a written request
for registration  received by the authority on or after January 1, 2016, and the staff of the sobering fa-
cility, may not be held criminally or civilly  liable for actions pursuant to ORS 430.315, 430.335, 430.397
to 430.401 and 430.402 provided the actions are in  good faith, on probable cause and without gross
negligence.]
OPIOID USE DISORDER MEDICATION GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 81. As used in sections 81 to 86 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Commission” means the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 63
(3) “Tribal  correctional facility” means a jail or prison in Oregon that is operated by a
federally recognized tribe and confines persons for more than 36 hours.
SECTION 82. (1) The Oregon Jail-Based Medications for  Opioid Use Disorder Grant Pro-
gram is established in the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission to provide opioid use disorder
treatment and transition planning services to persons in custody in  local correctional facili-
ties and tribal correctional facilities.
(2) The  commission, in collaboration with the Oregon Health Authority, shall administer
the grant program. At minimum,  the commission and authority shall collaborate to provide
grant recipients support with technical assistance and best practices.
SECTION 83.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall award grants to cities
and counties in Oregon that operate a local correctional facility and to federally recognized
tribes in Oregon that operate a tribal correctional facility.
(2) Applicants may  submit an individual application or a joint application in partnership
with other local correctional facilities or tribal correctional facilities.
(3) At least 10 percent of total moneys awarded to grant recipients must be awarded  to
local correctional facilities in rural areas,  as defined by the commission by rule, or tribal
correctional facilities. If any  amount of the 10 percent is not awarded during an initial ap-
plication cycle, the remaining amount may be  awarded to any otherwise eligible local
correctional facility or tribal correctional facility under a supplemental application cycle.
(4) The commission  may enter a contract with a third party to provide statewide tech-
nical assistance to grant recipients.
(5) The commission shall consider geographic equity when awarding grant funds.
SECTION 84.
Moneys awarded to grant recipients under section 83 of  this 2024 Act may
be used to:
(1) Provide medication, telemedicine  or any other reasonable treatment to persons in
custody with an opioid use disorder.
(2) Develop or operate mobile or nonmobile opioid treatment units.
(3) Administer screenings for opioid use disorder or risk of acute withdrawal.
(4) Facilitate transition planning services for persons in custody who seek or  receive
opioid use disorder treatment.
(5) Undertake any  other actions reasonably calculated to mitigate operational or struc-
tural barriers to providing opioid use disorder treatment in  local correctional facilities or
tribal correctional facilities, including but  not limited to mitigating any lack of secure stor-
age for medication.
SECTION 85.
The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall adopt rules necessary to
administer sections 81 to 86 of this 2024 Act. The rules, at minimum, must:
(1) Establish a methodology for reviewing  and approving grant applications and awarding
grants.
(2) Require applicants to submit  a statement acknowledging that any grant funds re-
ceived must be expended in accordance with the allowable uses  described in section 84 of this
2024 Act.
(3) Require applicants to submit a letter of commitment from each administrator of a
local correctional facility or tribal correctional facility who is associated with the application,
committing to participate in good faith in the grant program.
(4) Define “rural” for purposes of section 83 (3) of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 86.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission shall convene an advisory
committee to evaluate applications and make recommendations to the commission for the
awarding of grants under section 83 of this 2024 Act.
(2) The chairperson of the commission shall  exercise discretion to appoint members to
serve on the advisory committee.
SECTION 87.
 (1) The Oregon  Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund is es-
tablished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 64
earned by the Oregon Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund shall be  credited
to the fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated or otherwise  transferred to the fund
by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission for the purposes of carrying out sections 81 to 86 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 88. No later than December  1, 2024, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
shall submit a report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the  interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary and health care. The report must include:
(1) The name of each recipient of a grant under section 83 of this 2024 Act  and the
amount of moneys each grant recipient has received to date.
(2) Opportunities, if any, for local correctional facilities or tribal correctional facilities
to obtain medications for opioid use disorder from state agencies.
(3) Any other information  relevant to the provision of opioid use disorder treatment to
persons in custody in local correctional facilities or tribal correctional facilities.
SECTION 89. Section 88 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 90. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 91. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 1, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-A) Page 65